http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/hurricane_forecast 9 Atlantic hurricanes forecast for 2007 of the Web 9 Atlantic hurricanes forecast for 2007 2 hours, 41 minutes ago FORT COLLINS, Colo. - With the 2007 Atlantic hurricane season a few hours away, researcher William Gray released his newest forecast Thursday still showing an expectation for 17 named storms and nine hurricanes, five of them intense. Gray, based at Colorado State University, described it as a very active season. He said there was a 74 percent chance of a major hurricane making landfall somewhere on the U.S. coast. There is a 50 percent chance of a major hurricane making landfall on the East Coast, including the Florida Peninsula, according to the new forecast; the long-term average is 31 percent. The chance of a major hurricane hitting the Gulf Coast between the Florida Panhandle and Brownsville, Texas, is 49 percent; the long-term average is 30 percent. There is also an above-average chance of a major hurricane making landfall in the Caribbean, according to the forecast. Thursday's forecast was largely unchanged from Gray's last forecast, released in early April. "We expect an above-average hurricane season," said Phil Klotzbach, a member of Gray's team and lead author of the forecast. The Atlantic hurricane season, which runs from June 1 to Nov. 30, averages 9.6 named storms, 5.9 hurricanes and 2.3 intense hurricanes per year. There were 10 named Atlantic storms last year and five hurricanes, two of them major. None of the hurricanes hit the U.S. Atlantic coast. The devastating 2005 season set a record with 28 named storms, 15 of them hurricanes. Four hurricanes hit the U.S. coast, the worst among them Katrina, which devastated parts of the Gulf Coast. Full Coverage: Tropical Storms and Hurricanes Tropical Storm Barbara weakens in Mexico AP, 2 minutes ago Poll: Coast not ready for hurricanes AP, 1 hour, 43 minutes ago Drones Expected to Be New Eye Into Little-Seen Part of Hurricanes at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), Oct 03 Your pictures: Preparing for Florence at BBC, Sep 11 Study Finds Hurricanes Frequent in Some Cooler Periods Coastal areas brace for a busy season with 7 to 10 hurricanes forecast at Sun Sentinel, May 22 By any other name at The American Spectator, Sep 30 The next one kind as Ernesto at Miami Herald (reg. req'd), Aug 31 TB patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 Alabama gov. signs slavery apology N.H. governor signs civil unions law Dedication set for Billy Graham library TB on a plane? Sign of the times TB on a plane? Sign of the times N.H. governor signs civil unions law Crusader's son arrested on sex charge Alabama gov. signs slavery apology Marine vet faces hearing over protest TB patient moved to Denver hospital AP - 20 minutes ago Children hanged: Language barrier slows 911 call AP - 42 minutes ago King of Spam Blocked minutes ago Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 AP minutes ago Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. Proenza, new director of the National Hurricane Center, talks to the media next to... Tropical Storms and Hurricanes Engineering students are simulating a hurricane&#39;s winds to build better houses. CNN&#39;s John Zarrella reports. (May 29) &raquo; More CNN video &raquo; Show all news video and Tropical Storms TB patient moved to Denver hospital The Note: Testing Fred Thompson Ala. students graduate in wake of vicious storm PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostemailed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070526/ap_on_fe_st/odd_monster_pig Boy, 11, bags hog bigger than 'Hogzilla' 11, bags hog bigger than 'Hogzilla' By KATE BRUMBACK, Associated Press Writer Sat May 26, 9:32 AM ET MONTGOMERY, Ala. - Hogzilla is being made into a horror movie. But the sequel may be even bigger: Meet Monster Pig. An 11-year-old boy used a pistol to kill a wild hog his father says weighed a staggering 1,051 pounds and measured 9 feet 4, from the tip of its snout to the base of its tail. Think hams as big as car tires. If the claims are accurate, Jamison Stone's trophy boar would be bigger than Hogzilla, the famed wild hog that grew to seemingly mythical proportions after being killed in south Georgia in 2004. Hogzilla originally was thought to weigh 1,000 pounds and measure 12 feet long. experts who unearthed its remains believe the animal actually weighed about 800 pounds and was 8 feet long. Regardless of the comparison, Jamison is reveling in the attention over his pig. "It feels really good," Jamison said in a telephone interview with a good accomplishment. I probably won't ever kill anything else that big." Jamison, who killed his first deer at age 5, was hunting with father Mike Stone and two guides in east Alabama on May 3 when he bagged Monster Pig. He said he shot the huge animal eight times with a .50-caliber revolver and chased it for three hours through hilly woods before finishing it off with a point-blank shot. Through it all, there was the fear that the animal would turn and charge them, as wild boars have a reputation for doing. "I was a little bit scared, a little bit excited," said Jamison, who lives in Pickensville on the Mississippi border. He just finished the sixth grade on the honor roll at Christian Heritage Academy, a small, private school. His father said that, just to be extra safe, he and the guides had high-powered rifles aimed and ready to fire in case the beast, with 5-inch tusks, decided to charge. With the animal finally dead in a creek bed on the 2,500-acre Lost Creek Plantation, a commercial hunting preserve in Delta, trees had to be cut down and a backhoe brought in to bring Jamison's prize out of the woods. It was hauled on a truck to the Clay County Farmers Exchange in Lineville, where Jeff Kinder said they used his scale, recently calibrated, to weigh the hog. Kinder's scale measures only to the nearest 10, but Mike Stone said it balanced one notch past the 1,050-pound mark. "It probably weighed 1,060 pounds. We were just afraid to change it once the story was out," he said. The hog's head is being mounted by Jerry Cunningham of Jerry's Taxidermy. Cunningham said the animal measured 54 inches around the head, 74 inches around the shoulders and 11 inches from the eyes to the end of its snout. "It's huge," he said. "It's just the biggest thing I've ever seen." Mike Stone is having sausage made from the rest of the animal. "We'll probably get 500 to 700 pounds," he said. Jamison, meanwhile, has been offered a small part in "The Legend of Hogzilla," a small-time horror flick based on the tale of the Georgia boar. The movie is holding casting calls with plans to begin filming in Georgia. Jamison is enjoying the newfound celebrity generated by the hog hunt, but he said he prefers hunting pheasants to monster pigs: "They are a little less dangerous." Associated Press writer Jay Reeves in Birmingham contributed to this report. Promotional fax mistaken for bomb threat Orioles pitcher names son Jim Leyland Couple sue Wal-Mart over slip in vomit Musician canned for focus on wrong organ Amputee uses crutch to fight off gunmen Most Viewed: Odd News Musician canned for focus on wrong organ Couple sue Wal-Mart over slip in vomit Indian lawyers tie man to tree, beat him Promotional fax mistaken for bomb threat Orioles pitcher names son Jim Leyland Odd News - Video Removal of Bullet Alleviates Headache minutes ago Mail Delivered: Rain, Sleet, or Zero Gravity? AM ET Will You E-Marry Me? May 29, 11:32 PM ET Leapin&#39; Lizards: Reptile on the Loose May 29, 10:36 PM ET Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. In this photo released by Melynne Stone, Jamison Stone, 11, poses with a wild pig... Get answer for my critics Hershey Vs. Pot Dealer in Trademark Suit The Christian Science Monitor Tasks for next World Bank chief: heal rifts, tackle poverty Get the latest news, photos and video of the funky, and weird. &raquo; More at CNN.com Latest news on the strange, quirky and just plain odd. &raquo; More at USATODAY.com
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_hi_te/spam_arrest Man described as a top spammer arrested described as a top spammer arrested By GENE JOHNSON, AP Legal Affairs Writer AM ET SEATTLE - A 27-year-old man described as one of the world's most prolific spammers was arrested Wednesday, and federal authorities said computer users across the Web could notice a decrease in the amount of junk e-mail. Robert Alan Soloway is accused of using networks of compromised "zombie" computers to send out millions upon millions of spam e-mails. "He's one of the top 10 spammers in the world," said Tim Cranton, a Microsoft Corp. lawyer who is senior director of the company's Worldwide Internet Safety Programs. "He's a huge problem for our customers. This is a very good day." A federal grand jury last week returned a 35-count indictment against Soloway charging him with mail fraud, wire fraud, e-mail fraud, aggravated identity theft and money laundering. Soloway pleaded not guilty Wednesday afternoon to all charges after a judge determined that &#151; even with four bank accounts seized by the government &#151; he was sufficiently well off to pay for his own lawyer. He has been living in a ritzy apartment and drives an expensive Mercedes convertible, said prosecutor Kathryn Warma. Prosecutors are seeking to have him forfeit $773,000 they say he made from his business, Newport Internet Marketing Corp. A public defender who represented him for Wednesday's hearing declined to comment. Prosecutors say Soloway used computers infected with malicious code to send out millions of junk e-mails since 2003. The computers are called "zombies" because owners typically have no idea their machines have been infected. He continued his activities even after Microsoft won a $7 million civil judgment against him in 2005 and the operator of a small Internet service provider in Oklahoma won a $10 million judgment, prosecutors said. U.S. Attorney Jeff Sullivan said Wednesday that the case is the first in the country in which federal prosecutors have used identity theft statutes to prosecute a spammer for taking over someone else's Internet domain name. Soloway could face decades in prison, though prosecutors said they have not calculated what guideline sentencing range he might face. The investigation began when the authorities began receiving hundreds of complaints about Soloway, who had been featured on a list of known spammers kept by The Spamhaus Project, an international anti-spam organization. The Santa Barbara County, Calif., Department of Social Services said it was spending $1,000 a week to fight the spam it was receiving, and other businesses and individuals complained of having their reputations damaged when it appeared spam was originating from their computers. "This is not just a nuisance. This is way beyond a nuisance," Warma said. Soloway used the networks of compromised computers to send out unsolicited bulk e-mails urging people to use his Internet marketing company to advertise their products, authorities said. People who clicked on a link in the e-mail were directed to his Web site. There, Soloway advertised his ability to send out as many as 20 million e-mail advertisements over 15 days for $495, the indictment said. The Spamhaus Project rejoiced at his arrest. "Soloway has been a long-term nuisance on the Internet &#151; both in terms of the spam he sent, and the people he duped to use his spam service," organizers wrote on Spamhaus.org. Soloway remained in federal detention pending a hearing Monday. Full Coverage: Internet and WWW Apple to put YouTube on Apple TV Reuters, PM ET Viacom welcomes licensing opportunity from Apple TV Reuters, PM ET Coping with death on the web Online, GOP Is Playing Catch-Up at The Washington Post Connecticut To Require Sex Offender E-Mail Registration NewsFactor Web 2.0 'distracts good design' A shameful surrender to pornographers at Christian Science Monitor, Apr 02 Step cautiously into an online bank at Christian Science Monitor, Apr 02 Chip sales expected to grow by 2.5 pct. Five cos. win gov't telecom contract Japanese robot dances to iPod music Gates, Jobs make rare joint appearance U.S. soldiers face tough VOIP call Five cos. win gov't telecom contract Google takes big step to make Web work offline Palm unveils new laptop-like gadget Gates, Jobs make rare joint appearance Hong Kong cracks down on spam Technology & Health Video Captive Panda Found Dead in Wild minutes ago Apple says YouTube coming to Apple TV AP minutes ago Palm unveils new laptop-like gadget AP minutes ago Convertible crash test results CNN AM ET Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. Learn More About the Hitachi Hybrid & Hold Two Camcorders in One Hand. Nationwide Onsite Service & Support Troubleshooting, Upgrades, Training troubleshooting, Training, Networking, Upgrades, Graphics, Database, Digital Video. A 27-year-old man described as one of the world's most prolific spammers was arrested Wednesday,... coffee table computer &#39;I Became My Own Big Brother&#39; Swedes open embassy in Second Life See what's new in Windows Vista. The day's most popular tech news. People of the Web A grandfather- grandson team soothes souls with online hugs.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostemailed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070530/india_nm/india300642 Mumbai moves to make over Asia&#39;s biggest slum moves to make over Asia&#39;s biggest slum AM ET MUMBAI (Reuters) - Authorities in Mumbai invited bids from around the world on Wednesday to tear down Asia&#39;s biggest slum and replace it with gleaming new apartments for its hundreds of thousands of poor residents. "Redesign the township. Rehabilitate the families. It&#39;s a challenge. But rewards outweigh the Herculean task," said the bid by the Slum Rehabilitation Authority which is being published in 16 countries. The tender pegged the project cost at around &#36;2.3 billion and said about 57,000 "slum structures" would have to be replaced in the Dharavi slum. Considered a real estate eyesore, Dharavi stands on a 2 sq km patch of land -- estimated to be worth over &#36;10 billion -- and houses about 600,000 people in ramshackle, tarp-strewn roofed buildings. It was once a quiet fishing village before migrants, mostly from southern India, swelled its population and started hundreds of small businesses that make everything from leather goods to electrical equipment, junk jewellery and counterfeits. But it also stands in stark contrast to Mumbai&#39;s aspiration to be a modern city. Under the makeover plan, authorities want to construct more than half a dozen multi-storey buildings to house "eligible slum-dwellers" and leave the rest of the area for commercial activity. But the plan is suspect in the eyes of most of Dharavi&#39;s inhabitants who say they fear they will be tricked out of their homes. "Who is eligible? What is the eligibility? How many apartments? What happens to the rest of the people?" Jockin Arputham, head of India&#39;s National Slum Dwellers Federation, told Reuters. "There is no transparency in this at all." Arputham said they had hoped to be involved in the planning of Dharavi&#39;s redevelopment but now planned protests to force their point. "We will cripple train and air services in Mumbai," he said. Dharavi sits between two major suburban railway tracks and one end of the slum runs right up to the boundary of the city&#39;s airport. Its residents say they are also worried how they could run their businesses after the redevelopment as no space had been earmarked. "All these issues have to be looked at otherwise this plan will just remain on the drawing boards," said Raju Korde, who calls his group the Save Dharavi Committee. India, US hold talks on nuclear deal AFP, 2 hours, 47 minutes ago Indian family exhumes son&#39;s corpse to revive him Reuters, AM ET India rebels turn to poppy for funds In India, a Retail Revolution Takes Hold at The Washington Post Caste demands demotion to win state jobs at The Guardian (UK)., May 30 Army deployed after India riots 'Heady Times' For India And the U.S. at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), Apr 29 A blind eye to bigotry at The Guardian (UK)., Mar 01 Iraq residents rise up against al-Qaida Hezbollah, Syria denounce U.N. tribunal Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death U.S.: Dead detainee was of high value Blair: G-8 must keep pledges to Africa Panda released into wild found dead Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race There&#39;s something in the air in Rome: cocaine Putin issues sharp warning to US, vows to counter &#39;imperialism&#39; Iraq residents rise up against al-Qaida Captive Panda Found Dead in Wild minutes ago Removal of Bullet Alleviates Headache minutes ago Spain fights for rights to shipwreck booty AP - 59 minutes ago minutes ago with Bad Credit refinance requests only. High-rise buildings stand next to Dharavi, Asia&#39;s largest slum area located in Mumbai May 30,... elects surgeon as president Ex-KGB spy: UK tried to recruit me Missing Girl&#39;s Parents Blessed By Pontiff Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Limited. or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_eu/russia_putin Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race U.S. has triggered new arms race By VLADIMIR ISACHENKOV, Associated Press Writer 1 hour, 57 minutes ago said Thursday that tests of new Russian missiles were a response to the planned deployment of U.S. missile defense installations and other forces in Europe, suggesting Washington has triggered a new arms race. In a clear reference to the United States, he harshly criticized "imperialism" in global affairs and warned that Russia will strengthen its military potential to maintain a global strategic balance. "It wasn't us who initiated a new round of arms race," Putin said when asked about Russia's missile tests at a news conference after talks in the Kremlin with Greek President Karolos Papoulias. Putin described Tuesday's tests of a new ballistic missile capable of carrying multiple nuclear warheads and a new cruise missile as part of the Russian response to the planned deployment of new U.S. military bases and missile defense sites in ex-Soviet satellites in Central and Eastern Europe. He assailed the United States and other members for failing to ratify an amended version of the 1990 Conventional Forces in Europe (CFE) treaty, which limits the deployment of heavy non-nuclear weapons around the continent. "We have signed and ratified the CFE and are fully implementing it. We have pulled out all our heavy weapons from the European part of Russia to (locations) behind the Ural Mountains and cut our military by 300,000 men," Putin said. "And what about our partners? They are filling Eastern Europe with new weapons. A new base in Bulgaria, another one in Romania, a (missile defense) site in Poland and a radar in the Czech Republic," he said. "What we are supposed to do? We can't just sit back and look at that." Putin and other Russian officials have repeatedly rejected U.S. assurances that the planned missile defense installations are meant to counter a potential threat from nations such as and pose no danger to Russia. Putin reaffirmed his warning that Russia would opt out of the CFE treaty altogether if NATO nations fail to ratify its amended version. "Either you ratify the treaty and start observing it, or we will opt out of it," Putin said. In remarks clearly directed against Washington, Putin blasted those "who want to dictate their will to all others regardless of international norms and law." "It's dangerous and harmful," he added. "Norms of the international law were replaced with political expediency. We view it as diktat and imperialism." Russia this week initiated an international conference to be held in Austria in early June to discuss the situation around the CFE treaty. Putin described the tests of new missiles conducted by Russia on Tuesday as a necessary response to the Western action. "There is no reason to fear these actions by Russia, they aren't aggressive. It's merely a response to tough and unfounded unilateral actions by our partners," he said. "These actions are aimed at preserving a global balance." In one missile test Tuesday, a prototype of new Russia's intercontinental ballistic missile, called the RS-24, was fired from a mobile launcher at the Plesetsk launch site in northwestern Russia and its test warhead landed on target 3,400 miles away on the Far Eastern Kamchatka Peninsula, officials said. Russia's military also tested a new cruise missile based on the existing short-range Iskander missile. "We will keep modernizing our potential," Putin said. Russian suspect says British secret service killed Litvinenko AFP, 28 minutes ago Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death AP, 1 hour, 39 minutes ago Project born in the Cold War at Daily Telegraph (UK), May 29 Wealth gap leaves rural Russia behind Russia blames US in missile row Suspect Accuses British in Spy's Death Killing the Russian Media at The Economist, Apr 26 Iraq residents rise up against al-Qaida Hezbollah, Syria denounce U.N. tribunal Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death U.S.: Dead detainee was of high value Blair: G-8 must keep pledges to Africa Panda released into wild found dead There&#39;s something in the air in Rome: cocaine Putin issues sharp warning to US, vows to counter &#39;imperialism&#39; Iraq residents rise up against al-Qaida Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death Captive Panda Found Dead in Wild minutes ago Removal of Bullet Alleviates Headache minutes ago Spain fights for rights to shipwreck booty AP - 59 minutes ago minutes ago Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Russian President Vladimir Putin, left, speaks at a news conference after a meeting with Greek... Russian President Vladimir Putin News - AP surgeon as president Ex-KGB spy: UK tried to recruit me Missing Girl&#39;s Parents Blessed By Pontiff Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostemailed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_fe_st/odd_catholic_ultimatum Musician canned for focus on wrong organ canned for focus on wrong organ PM ET NEW FRANKEN, Wis. - A Catholic priest has removed his church's organist and choir director from her duties saying her sale of sex toys was not "consistent with Church teachings." Linette Servais, 50, played the organ and sung with the choir for 35 years. Much of her work as choir director and organist was done without pay. When her parish priest asked to meet with her, she thought it was to say thank you. Instead, she was told to quit her sales job with company known as Pure Romance or she would lose her position in the church. Pure Romance in Loveland, Ohio, is a $60 million per year business that sells spa products and sex toys at homes parties attended by women. It has 15,000 consultants like Servais. She said her decision was not hard: She began working with Pure Romance after a brain tumor and treatment left her sexually dysfunctional. The job allows her to help other women who have similar problems. "After I got over the initial shock, I prayed over this a long time," she said. "I feel that Pure Romance is my ministry." The Rev. Dean Dombroski felt differently, removing her from the choir loft just before Thanksgiving and gradually taking away other church duties. Servais can no longer take pictures during First Communion services or lead the committee planning St. Joseph's annual late-summer picnic. Dombroski said he couldn't discuss the situation because it involves personnel. But in a letter to his rural congregation, he wrote: "Linette is a consultant for a firm which sells products of a sexual nature that are not consistent with Church teachings. Because parish leaders are expected to model the teaching of our faith ... she could stay on as the choir director/organist or she could continue to be a consultant but she could not do both." Servais responded with her own three-page letter to church members, saying she felt compelled to help other women, especially those suffering from problems caused by cancer. Many choir members quit in support, she said, and some have gathered at her home on occasional Thursdays to sing hymns. "Father Dean made it sound so sinful," she said. "There is so much more to this business than toys." Information from: Milwaukee Journal Sentinel, Promotional fax mistaken for bomb threat Orioles pitcher names son Jim Leyland Couple sue Wal-Mart over slip in vomit Amputee uses crutch to fight off gunmen N.Y. taxi license hits record price: $600,000 Most Viewed: Odd News Couple sue Wal-Mart over slip in vomit Indian lawyers tie man to tree, beat him Promotional fax mistaken for bomb threat Orioles pitcher names son Jim Leyland Boy, 11, bags hog bigger than 'Hogzilla' Odd News - Video Removal of Bullet Alleviates Headache minutes ago Mail Delivered: Rain, Sleet, or Zero Gravity? AM ET Will You E-Marry Me? May 29, 11:32 PM ET Leapin&#39; Lizards: Reptile on the Loose May 29, 10:36 PM ET Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. An answer for my critics Hershey Vs. Pot Dealer in Trademark Suit The Christian Science Monitor Tasks for next World Bank chief: heal rifts, tackle poverty Get the latest news, photos and video of the funky, and weird. &raquo; More at CNN.com Latest news on the strange, quirky and just plain odd. &raquo; More at USATODAY.com
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/civil_unions N.H. governor signs civil unions law of the Web N.H. governor signs civil unions law By BEVERLEY WANG, Associated Press Writer CONCORD, N.H. - Gay couples in New Hampshire can start applying for many of the rights and responsibilities of marriage as early as January under a law Gov. John Lynch signed Thursday establishing civil unions. "We in New Hampshire have had a long and proud tradition taking the lead in opposing discrimination," Lynch said. "Today that tradition continues." Couples who enter civil unions will have the same rights, responsibilities and obligations as married couples. Same-sex unions from other states also would be recognized if they were legal in the state where they were performed. Legislators who gathered for the bill signing packed the governor's chambers and overflowed into an adjoining sitting room. They snapped photos and burst into applause as he signed it. "I've listened and I've heard all the arguments," said Lynch, a Democrat. "I do not believe that this bill threatens marriage. I believe that this is a matter of conscience and fairness." Episcopal Bishop V. Gene Robinson was among those attending. Although his consecration in 2003 as the first openly gay bishop in the Episcopal Church divided the worldwide Anglican Communion to which it belongs, Robinson and his longtime partner plan to take advantage of civil unions. "This is not a radical departure," Robinson said of the bill. "This is a real confirmation of what New Hampshire has always been about: the freedom of its own citizens and fairness for everyone." Robinson said he will not direct Episcopal priests in the state to bless same-sex unions, letting priests decide that individually. Such blessings have been another divisive issue for Episcopalians and the Anglican union. "That authority belongs to them and I would not in any way ask them not to do that. ... Just like in marriages, every priest will have the option to bless or not to bless," Robinson said. Massachusetts alone among the U.S. states allows gay marriage. Connecticut, Vermont, New Jersey, Maine, California and Washington allow either civil unions or domestic partnerships, and Oregon will join the list with New Hampshire in January. Hawaii extends certain spousal rights to same-sex couples and cohabiting heterosexual pairs. (This version CORRECTS name to Anglican Communion.) Full Coverage: Gay & Lesbian Issues Washington urges tolerance in TV spot AP Ban kept for gay men donating blood AP NY couples celebrate gay marriage ruling AP Anglican church turmoil over gay issues deepens Reuters at TIME Magazine, Feb 22 In N.J., getting an early start on civil unions at Philadelphia Inquirer (reg req'd), Feb 20 at The Washington Post Recognition of gay couples spreads at Toronto Star (reg req'd), Apr 24 TB patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 Alabama gov. signs slavery apology 9 Atlantic hurricanes forecast for 2007 Dedication set for Billy Graham library TB on a plane? Sign of the times TB on a plane? Sign of the times 9 Atlantic hurricanes forecast for 2007 Crusader's son arrested on sex charge Alabama gov. signs slavery apology Marine vet faces hearing over protest TB patient moved to Denver hospital AP - 20 minutes ago Children hanged: Language barrier slows 911 call AP - 42 minutes ago King of Spam Blocked minutes ago Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 AP minutes ago with Bad Credit refinance requests only. Santiago Porrero, the owner of a wedding shop that bills itself as Europe's first to... & Lesbian Issues TB patient moved to Denver hospital The Note: Testing Fred Thompson Ala. students graduate in wake of vicious storm PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostemailed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_bi_go_ec_fi/economy Economy nearly stalled in first quarter nearly stalled in first quarter By JEANNINE AVERSA, AP Economics Writer 1 hour, 39 minutes ago WASHINGTON - The economy nearly stalled in the first quarter with growth slowing to a pace of just 0.6 percent. That was the worst three-month showing in over four years. The new reading on the gross domestic product, released by the Thursday, showed that economic growth in the January-through-March quarter was much weaker. Government statisticians slashed by more than half their first estimate of a 1.3 percent growth rate for the quarter. The main culprits for the downgrade: the bloated trade deficit and businesses cutting investment in supplies of the goods they hold in inventories. "We are still keeping our head above water &#151; barely," said economist Ken Mayland of ClearView Economics. For nearly a year, the economy has been enduring a stretch of subpar economic growth due mostly to a sharp housing slump. That in turn has made some businesses act more cautiously in their spending and investing. The economy's 0.6 percent growth rate in the opening quarter of this year marked a big loss of momentum from the 2.5 percent pace logged in the final quarter of last year. Chairman Ben Bernanke doesn't believe the economy will slide into recession this year, nor do Bush administration officials. But ex-Fed chief has put the odds at one in three. On Wall Street, investors took the weak showing in stride. The Dow Jones industrials were up 22 points and the Nasdaq gained 14 points in morning trading. The first-quarter's performance was the weakest since the final quarter of 2002, when the economy was recovering from a recession. At that time, GDP eked out a 0.2 percent growth rate. Economists were predicting the first-quarter performance this year would be downgraded, but not as much as it did. They were calling for a 0.8 percent pace. GDP measures the value of all goods and services produced in the United States. It is considered the best measure of the country's economic fitness. In other economic news, the Labor Department reported that fewer people signed up for unemployment benefits last week. New filings dropped by 4,000 to 310,000. That suggests the employment climate is weathering well the economy's sluggish spell. Another report showed that construction spending edged up by 0.1 percent in April, down from a 0.6 percent gain in the previous month. Spending by private builders on nonresidential projects and spending by the government on big projects each climbed to all time highs in April but that strength was tempered by continued weakness in residential construction. In the GDP report, many economists believe the first quarter will be the low point for this year. They expect growth will improve but still be sluggish. The National Association for Business Economics predicts the economy will expand at a 2.3 percent pace in the April-to-June quarter. In the first quarter, there was a larger trade deficit than first thought. That ended up shaving a full percentage point from the GDP. Businesses cut back on inventory investment as they tried to make sure unsold stocks of goods didn't get out of whack with customer demand. That lopped off nearly a percentage point to first quarter GDP. Those were the biggest factors behind the government slicing its initial GDP estimate released a month ago by as much as it did. The sour housing market also restrained overall economic activity. Investment in home building was cut by 15.4 percent, on an annualized basis, in the first quarter. However, that wasn't as deep a cut as the 17 percent annualized drop initially estimated. And, it wasn't as severe as the 19.8 percent annualized drop seen in the final quarter of last year. Even so, there is no doubt that troubled housing market is one of the biggest problems for the economy. Although some businesses tightened the belt in the first quarter, consumers did not. That helped to prevent the economy from stalling out altogether. Consumers boosted their spending by a 4.4 percent growth rate in the first quarter, the most in a year. Consumer spending accounts for a major chunk of economic activity. Some economists wonder how much interest consumers will have in continued brisk spending, however, given rising gasoline prices that have topped $3 a gallon in many markets. More money spent filling up the gas tank leaves less to spend on other things. One of the reasons consumers have stayed so resilient even as the housing market has been stuck in a rut for a year is because the job market has been good. Employers &#151; still enjoying profits &#151; are keeping a close watch on spending but they are not drastically clamping down on hiring. Companies profits gained a bit of ground in the first quarter. One measure showed after tax profits rising by 1 percent, up from 0.8 percent in the fourth quarter. An inflation gauge tied to the GDP report and closely watched by the Fed showed that core prices &#151; excluding food and energy &#151; rose at a rate of 2.2 percent in the first quarter. That was unchanged from an initial estimate but up from a 1.8 percent pace in the fourth quarter. The Federal Reserve's key interest rate has been at 5.25 percent for nearly a year. Many economists predict the rate probably will stay right where it is through the rest of this year. Full Coverage: U.S. Economy Stocks up after takeover news, GDP data AP, 13 minutes ago First-quarter growth weak, future looks brighter Reuters, 36 minutes ago Dollar buying ever less of world's goods The Christian Science Monitor Why Wall Street is worried at The Guardian (UK)., Mar 14 Economic Growth Stalls in First Quarter at The Washington Post U.S. Economic Growth Weakest in Over 4 Years The Upside of Recession? at Newsweek via MSNBC, Apr 24 The scientific way to beat the market at The Los Angeles 22 Wachovia to buy A.G. Edwards for &#36;6.8B Northwest exits bankruptcy protection Stocks up after takeover news, GDP data FDA nixes fast track for cancer vaccine First-quarter growth weak, future looks brighter Wellpoint CFO ousted, violated code of conduct Wachovia to buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 billion Leaner Northwest Airlines exits bankruptcy First-quarter growth weak, future looks brighter Northwest exits bankruptcy protection Wal-Mart Report Spells Trouble AM ET Dell to sell &#39;in Wal-Mart&#39; BBC AM ET College Loan Rates to Increase AM ET Traders floored by NYSE change CNN - PM ET Make Money in Growth Stocks. We have a Winner for You. Online Currency Trading - Free Demo 24-Hour trading, award-winning software, charts and more from GFT. Get plant is nation&#39;s most productive Silicon Insider: High Tech Labor Day S&P&#39;s run: A record for a new era Optimists take charge, and summer interns rule. &raquo; Read Today's Column Get advice on how to manage the outcome of your income. &raquo; More from Yahoo! Finance Get the latest news, features and photos.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostemailed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_en_mo/film_harry_potter New 'Potter' to open sooner than planned 'Potter' to open sooner than planned 2 hours, 41 minutes ago LOS ANGELES - Good news for fans awaiting release of the boy wizard's next movie. "Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix," the fifth movie based on the best-selling books, will open in U.S. theaters July 11, two days earlier than expected. The film, directed by David Yates, was scheduled to be released July 13. Warner Bros., which is distributing the film, gave no explanation for the change. The world premiere of the movie will be held June 28 in Tokyo, followed by a London premiere July 3. The film franchise is based on the best-selling novels by The seventh and final book in the series, "Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows," is still scheduled for release July 21. Full Coverage: Harry Potter Rowling to give reading of new Potter AP Japanese debut for Potter movie Harry Potter film to premiere in Tokyo AP Harry Potter gets stamp of approval Reuters Harry Potter and the mystery of an academic obsession at The Guardian (UK)., Aug 06 'I'll miss Harry' says JK Rowling at BBC, Aug 02 Harry Potter and Our Forgotten History at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), Jul 28 J.K. Rowling critic would be dead if recent e-mails were really fire-breathing dragons at San Francisco Chronicle, Jul 26 Harry Potter theme park headed to Fla. Richie fears she may go to jail too Lohan's dad: Lindsay hooked on OxyContin Thompson won't be back on 'Law & Order' Lohan's dad: Lindsay hooked on OxyContin Lovitz, Laugh Factory make lifelong deal Richie fears she may go to jail too Lohan's dad: Lindsay hooked on OxyContin Harry Potter theme park headed to Fla. WOMAN OUT OF WHEELCHAIR IS IGNORED BY PASSERS-BY Lohan&#39;s dad: Lindsay hooked on OxyContin AP - 38 minutes ago Jackson items under hammer BBC AM ET Thursday&#39;s live music lineup CNN AM ET Theme park for Potter fans BBC AM ET Buy a Universal Orlando Vacation, Get 7 days of Unlimited Admission. 1000 Raffle Tickets - $45, Free Shipping 500 for $40, 1000 for $45, 2000 for $75, 3000 for $105, 4000 for $135, 5000 for $16.5, additional 1000s only $27. Custom printed & shipped free within 24 hrs. Ask about next day delivery. Order a free vacation planning DVD. See the Magic of Disney Parks. In this artist rendering provided by Universal Orlando 'The Wizarding World of Harry Potter' at... News - AP a living out of LEGO How Do You Spell Success? Can you wrap your head around the bandanna? Vote for your favorite movie spoof. Whitney Matheson blogs on showbiz. &raquo; Entertainment on USAToday PEOPLE OF THE WEB One-time child star Kirk Cameron goes online to save souls.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_en_tv/people_lovitz Lovitz, Laugh Factory make lifelong deal Laugh Factory make lifelong deal AM ET has made a lifelong commitment &#151; to the Laugh Factory. The comic announced Wednesday that he has signed a contract to appear at the Sunset Strip club every Wednesday night for the rest of his life. "Or, if he's in New York to do a movie or something, he can appear at the Laugh Factory there. But he's committed to every Wednesday night," club owner Jamie Masada said. Lovitz said he's expecting a long run. "Who knows? I could become the of Los Angeles," he said. "God knows I've got enough Hawaiian shirts." As part of the deal, the 49-year-old "Saturday Night Live" alum will also write a Laugh Factory blog giving advice to up-and-coming comedians. "His contract is very lucrative," Masada quipped. "If he lives to be 100 years old, I'll owe him part of the club." Harry Potter theme park headed to Fla. Richie fears she may go to jail too Lohan's dad: Lindsay hooked on OxyContin New 'Potter' to open sooner than planned Thompson won't be back on 'Law & Order' Richie fears she may go to jail too Lohan's dad: Lindsay hooked on OxyContin Harry Potter theme park headed to Fla. New 'Potter' to open sooner than planned WOMAN OUT OF WHEELCHAIR IS IGNORED BY PASSERS-BY Lohan&#39;s dad: Lindsay hooked on OxyContin AP - 38 minutes ago Jackson items under hammer BBC AM ET Thursday&#39;s live music lineup CNN AM ET Theme park for Potter fans BBC AM ET Buy a Universal Orlando Vacation, Get 7 days of Unlimited Admission. 1000 Raffle Tickets - $45, Free Shipping 500 for $40, 1000 for $45, 2000 for $75, 3000 for $105, 4000 for $135, 5000 for $16.5, additional 1000s only $27. Custom printed & shipped free within 24 hrs. Ask about next day delivery. Order a free vacation planning DVD. See the Magic of Disney Parks. Actor Jon Lovitz poses on the press line at 'The 14th Annual Race to Erase... Get a living out of LEGO How Do You Spell Success? Can you wrap your head around the bandanna? Vote for your favorite movie spoof. Whitney Matheson blogs on showbiz. &raquo; Entertainment on USAToday PEOPLE OF THE WEB One-time child star Kirk Cameron goes online to save souls.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_go_ca_st_pe/us_iraq Cease-fire eyed to stop violence in Iraq eyed to stop violence in Iraq By PAULINE JELINEK, Associated Press Writer 1 hour, 3 minutes ago WASHINGTON - U.S. military commanders are talking with Iraqi militants about cease-fires and other arrangements to try to stop the violence, the No. 2 American commander said Thursday. And he suggested he might not be able to strictly meet the September deadline for telling Congress whether 's military build up in Lt. Gen. Raymond Odierno said commanders at all levels are being empowered to reach out for talks with militants, tribes, religious leaders and others in the country that has been gripped by violence on a range of fronts including insurgents, sectarian rivals and common criminals. "It's just beginning, so we have a lot of work to do in this," he said. "But we have restructured ourselves ... to work this issue." He said he thinks 80 percent of Iraqis &#151; including Sunni insurgents and Shia militants &#151; can reach reconciliation with each other, though most al-Qaida operatives won't. "We are talking about cease-fires, and maybe signing some things that say they won't conduct operations against the government of Iraq or against coalition forces.," Odierno told reporters in a video conference from Baghdad. On the assessment of operations that is due in September, he said he thinks it will take longer to tell whether the increase of nearly 30,000 troops will work as intended &#151; that is, to quell violence enough to give Iraqi officials breathing space to work on reconciliation and development issues. "The way I understand it, is we're going to be required to provide an assessment in September. So I will provide my assessment," Odierno said, adding it might not be complete. He said he will be able to assess the work of forces that arrived for the beginning of the build up in February, but that the ones just arrived this week won't be in place for a couple of weeks &#151; meaning it will be August before he might be able to tell how they're doing. "So that'll be the first time I'll be able to make a real initial assessment of the true affect of the surge," he said. "The assessment might be 'I need a little more time. ' The assessment might be, 'I've seen enough, and it's effective or I've seen enough, and it's not going to be effective.' "Right now if you asked me, I would tell you I'll probably need a little bit more time to do a true assessment," he said. "If I think I might need a little bit more time, I will give an assessment saying, 'But I'd like to have more time'," Odierno said. He said the increased effort by commanders to reach out to militants goes hand in hand with reconciliation efforts by the Iraqi government. Odierno noted that efforts to engage tribal leaders in Anbar province &#151; who have been turning against al-Qaida there &#151; has helped draw people to serve in the Iraqi security forces in record numbers and has helped reduce attacks there. For example, the attacks in Anbar in May 2006 totaled 811, while this May they were just barely over 400, Odierno said. Since the beginning of 2007, over 12,000 Iraqi citizens have volunteered for Iraqi security forces in Anbar. In all of 2006, only 1,000 had volunteered. Prime Minister Nouri al-Maliki and other leaders are under increasing pressure from Washington to do more to achieve reconciliation among factions because, officials argue, no amount of military force can bring peace to the country without political peace. Al-Maliki announced a national reconciliation proposal nearly a year ago that has made limited progress. It offered some amnesty to members of the Sunni-led insurgency and a change in a law that had removed senior members of 's Baath Party from their jobs. "I believe there are elements that are irreconcilable, but I believe the large majority are," Odierno said. "I believe about 80 percent are reconcilable, both Jaish al-Mahdi as well as Sunni insurgents," though very few of al-Qaida. "There will be always people that are irreconcilable and ... the Iraqi government, with our support, will have to continue to conduct operations against those forces," he said. "Prime Minister Maliki and the government of Iraq have to continue to reach out to all these groups ... bringing these groups into the political process so we can deal with their differences in a peaceful way instead of in violent ways,:" Odierno said. Associated Press Writer Lolita Baldor contributed to this report. Iraq bomber kills 20, Sunni militants clash Reuters, 25 minutes ago Iraq residents rise up against al-Qaida AP, 28 minutes ago Where life is cheap and easy to take at Daily Telegraph (UK), May 30 Life in a remote US Army outpost in Iraq: IEDs, DVDs, and A/C The Christian Science Monitor Many killed in Iraq suicide bomb Search continues for Iraq Britons The Hard Truth About Leaving Iraq RealClearPolitics Bush calls for global emissions goals Edwards wants probe of high gas prices N.H. governor signs civil unions law Bush sees South Korea model for Iraq Sen. Clinton defends private jet travel Sen. Clinton defends private jet travel Rice holds line on Iran nuclear program Bush sees South Korea model for Iraq Thompson moves toward White House bid Former U.S. security boss blasts furore over Dubai Ports Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 AP minutes ago CNN minutes ago Stephanopoulos on Fred Thompson AM ET Raw Politics: Watchdogs barking CNN AM ET Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. of Sadr city, Baghdad inspect a damaged car after a joint U.S.-Iraqi forces raid,... House News - AP 15 nations to set global emissions goal Brinkley Describes Reagan&#39;s Inner Narrative Bush calls for global emissions goals "What would you include in legislation to address global warming?" Offer your ideas. SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. &raquo; More from Congressional Quarterly People of the Web A gay blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070531/ts_nm/russia_usa_missile_dc U.S. "imperialism" means new arms race: Putin "imperialism" means new arms race: Putin 1 hour, 53 minutes ago MOSCOW (Reuters) - Russian President launched a scathing attack on the West on Thursday, accusing Washington of imperialism and of starting a new arms race. Speaking a week before he meets leaders of the Group of Eight (G-8) industrial nations in Germany, Putin said Russia&#39;s tests on Tuesday of a two new missiles were a direct response to U.S. moves to create a missile defense system. "We are not the initiators of this new round of the arms race," Putin told a joint Kremlin news conference with visiting Greek President Karolos Papoulias. "There is no need to fear Russia&#39;s actions: they are not aggressive," he said. "They are a mere response to harsh and groundless unilateral actions by our partners and are aimed at maintaining the balance of forces in the world." Putin&#39;s comments, which will be popular among ordinary Russians in a year when there is a parliamentary election, are the latest in a line of harsh outbursts against the West. Russia on Tuesday test-fired a new intercontinental ballistic missile with multiple warheads and a new cruise missiles, which Russian generals say are sufficient to ensure the country&#39;s security for the next 40 years. "Our partners are stuffing eastern Europe with new weapons," Putin said. "What are we supposed to do? We cannot just observe all this." Moscow has been alarmed by U.S. plans to deploy elements of its global missile defense system in Poland and the Czech Republic. Washington says it wants to avert attacks from "rogue states" such as but Russia sees a threat to its own security. "There is a clear desire by some international players to dictate their will to everyone without adhering to international law," Putin said. "International law has been replaced by political reasons." "In our opinion it is nothing different from diktat, nothing different from imperialism," he added. RUSSIA FORCED TO DESIGN NEW MISSILES Relations between Russia and the United States are strained by issues that also include U.S. concerns that human rights and democracy are backsliding in Russia. Putin and Bush have a chance to discuss their countries&#39; differences at talks in the United States on July 1-2. Putin said Russia had to design new missiles after Washington quit the Cold War-era Anti-Ballistic Missile (ABM) treaty in order to pursue its missile shield project. "We have warned them then that we will come out with a response to maintain the strategic balance in the world," he said. "We conducted a test of a new strategic ballistic missile with multiple warheads, and of a new cruise missile, and will continue to improve our resources." In another move putting Russia at odds with the West, Putin has frozen Russia&#39;s commitments under the 1990 Conventional Forces in Europe (CFE) pact, which limits heavy weapons deployed between the Atlantic and the Urals mountains. countries for failing to ratify the 1999 version of the treaty which took into account the collapse of the Soviet Union and the departure of its Warsaw Pact allies. NATO believes Russia should first meets its commitment to withdraw military bases from ex-Soviet Georgia and Moldova. "We say: ratify the treaty and start carrying it out or we will quit it for good," Putin said. Russian suspect says British secret service killed Litvinenko AFP, 26 minutes ago Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death AP, 1 hour, 37 minutes ago Project born in the Cold War at Daily Telegraph (UK), May 29 Wealth gap leaves rural Russia behind Russia blames US in missile row Suspect Accuses British in Spy's Death Killing the Russian Media at The Economist, Apr 26 Economy nearly stalled in first quarter TB patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 N.H. governor signs civil unions law Iraq residents rise up against al-Qaida Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race Most Viewed: Top Stories All aboard for the Harry Potter rollercoaster Bush unveils climate strategy ahead of G8 U.S. says fourth Iranian American detained in Iran May toll for U.S. soldiers in Iraq climbs to 122 China scientists shed new light on male infertility Punta Gorda: 3 Years Later AM ET hours, 20 minutes ago New Study Links Cancer To Ground Zero Toxins CBS 2 New York AM ET Panda dies after release from captivity AP AM ET Russian President Vladimir Putin gestures during a news conference after his meeting with Greek counterpart... answer for my critics Hershey Vs. Pot Dealer in Trademark Suit Ala. students graduate in wake of vicious storm People of the Web A violent video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. Limited. or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostemailed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_as/china_panda_death Panda released into wild found dead released into wild found dead By AUDRA ANG, Associated Press Writer AM ET BEIJING - The first panda to be released into bamboo forests after being bred in captivity has died, and a Chinese nature preserve official said Thursday it may have fallen from trees while being chased by wild pandas. The body of Xiang Xiang was found Feb. 19 on snow-covered ground in the forests of Sichuan province in China's southwest, the Xinhua News Agency said. He survived less than a year in the wild after nearly three years of training in survival techniques and defense tactics. "Xiang Xiang died of serious internal injuries in the left side of his chest and stomach by falling from a high place," Heng Yi, an official from the Wolong Giant Panda Research Center in Sichuan, said in a telephone interview. "The scratches and other minor injuries caused by other wild pandas were found on his body," he said. "So Xiang Xiang may have fallen from trees when being chased by those pandas." Heng said the long delay in announcing Xiang Xiang's death was attributed to the need for a full investigation. "We are all sad about Xiang Xiang, but it doesn't mean the project has failed," Zhang Hemin, the center's head, was quoted as saying by Xinhua. "The lessons we have learnt from what happened to Xiang Xiang will help us adapt and improve the project." The 176-pound male panda was released from Wolong in April 2006 and had been trained for almost three years on how to survive in the wild. Xiang Xiang, whose name means auspicious, learned how to build a den, forage for food and mark his territory, experts at Wolong have said. He also developed defensive skills such as howling and biting. According to Li Desheng, deputy director of the Wolong center, Xiang Xiang's case shows that proves that wild panda communities are reluctant to accept male outsiders. "We chose Xiang Xiang because we thought that a strong male panda would have a better chance of surviving in the harsh natural environment," Li was quoted as saying. "But the other male pandas clearly saw Xiang Xiang as a threat. Next time we will choose a female panda." State media last year said that Xiang Xiang hesitated for a second when the door of his cage was opened, then scampered off into a nearby bamboo forest where he was tracked by a global positioning device attached to his collar. He has been buried at the foot of a mountain, about eight miles from the Wolong center, Li said. There are only about 1,600 wild pandas in the mountain forests of central China &#151; the only place in the world they are found &#151; and more than 180 live in captivity. Pandas are threatened by loss of habitat, poaching and a low reproduction rate. Females in the wild typically have a cub once every two to three years. Full Coverage: Endangered and Threatened Species Freed Chinese panda dies in wild Palm oil puts squeeze on Asia's endangered orangutan Reuters Rhinos running out of space - conservationists Reuters Scientists seek approval to kill sharks AP Pulling species from the brink at BBC, Mar 19 Macquarie's feral cats: a delicate ecological balance at The Independent (UK), Feb 21 A Fungus Brings Dinosaurs Fate to Frogs 21 President Bush v. polar bears at Albuquerque Tribune, Jan 09 Iraq residents rise up against al-Qaida Hezbollah, Syria denounce U.N. tribunal Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death U.S.: Dead detainee was of high value Blair: G-8 must keep pledges to Africa Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death Putin issues sharp warning to US, vows to counter &#39;imperialism&#39; Hezbollah, Syria denounce U.N. tribunal Iraq residents rise up against al-Qaida Captive Panda Found Dead in Wild minutes ago Removal of Bullet Alleviates Headache minutes ago Spain fights for rights to shipwreck booty AP - 59 minutes ago minutes ago Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. panda 'Xiang Xiang' is anaesthetized for a health checkup the Wolong Giant Panda Protection... Captive Panda Found Dead in Wild Panda born in captivity and then released into the wild was found dead. &raquo; More ABC News video Panda dies after release from captivity A 5-year-old panda - who last year became the first to be released into the wild after being bred in captivity - has died. (May 31) &raquo; More AP video &raquo; Show all news video & Pets News elects surgeon as president Ex-KGB spy: UK tried to recruit me Missing Girl&#39;s Parents Blessed By Pontiff Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostemailed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070531/bs_nm/agedwards_wachovia_dc Wachovia to buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 billion to buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 billion 1 hour, 55 minutes ago NEW YORK (Reuters) - Wachovia Corp. (NYSE: ) on Thursday said it will buy A.G. Edwards Inc. (NYSE: ) for &#36;6.8 billion in cash and stock, creating the second-largest U.S. retail brokerage. The combined brokerage, to be known as Wachovia Securities, would have 14,784 brokers, propelling it past Citigroup Inc. (NYSE: ) and ranking just behind Merrill Lynch & Co. (NYSE: ). Its &#36;1.15 trillion of client assets would trail only Merrill and Citigroup. Wachovia Securities expects to command a 14 percent market share, operate 3,350 offices and employ 31,000 people. "Brokerages are demographically attractive with the anticipated graying of baby boomers and increase in retirement assets," said Joseph Dickerson, an analyst at Atlantic Equities in London. "Wachovia is also acquiring the advantage of more scale." The terms value A.G. Edwards at &#36;89.50 per share, a 16 percent premium over the stock&#39;s closing price on Wednesday and about 21.5 times expected 2007 earnings. Through Wednesday, A.G. Edwards shares had already risen 22 percent this year. Shareholders would receive 0.9844 of a Wachovia share and &#36;35.80 in cash for each of their shares. Founded in 1887, St. Louis-based A.G. Edwards is the largest independent U.S. brokerage, with 6,618 brokers and &#36;374 billion of client assets. Wachovia Securities has 8,166 brokers and &#36;773 billion of client assets. Charlotte, North Carolina-based Wachovia, the No. 4 U.S. bank, said the acquisition will expand its brokerage operations in 48 of the 50 largest U.S. metropolitan areas. The combined brokerage would be based in St. Louis. Wachovia Securities is now based in Richmond, Virginia. The purchase "allows us to leverage our investment banking, underwriting and origination capability," Wachovia Chief Executive Ken Thompson said on a conference call. "We will get more mandates on the investment banking side simply because of the greatly expanded retail distribution we will have. (This) will also allow us to sell considerably more bank products." He added, "This is an endgame for us. We&#39;ve got everything we need right now to grow this business organically." The deal comes eight months after Wachovia bought Oakland, California, thrift Golden West Financial Corp. for &#36;24.2 billion, significantly expanding its mortgage operations. In morning trading, A.G. Edwards shares rose &#36;10.62, or 13.8 percent, to &#36;87.77. Wachovia fell 31 cents to &#36;54.24. Shares of Raymond James Financial Inc. (NYSE: ), the largest remaining independent brokerage, rose as much as 9.5 percent. Prudential Financial Inc. (NYSE: ), which has a 38 percent stake in Wachovia Securities, said it supports the acquisition. "It&#39;s a good deal for Wachovia," said Mark Batty, an analyst at PNC Wealth Management in Philadelphia, which invests &#36;74 billion. "In retail brokerage, scale is key." Wachovia Securities Chief Executive Daniel Ludeman will retain his title, while A.G. Edwards Chairman and Chief Executive Robert Bagby will be chairman of the combined brokerage. "We&#39;ve found a perfect partner," Bagby said on the call. "We knew we needed scale, we knew we needed additional products (amid) a demand from our clients to have one-stop financial services. We could not provide that." Wachovia expects the transaction to close in the fourth quarter, add 1 cent per share to its 2008 operating profit, and generate a 24 percent internal rate of return. It expects &#36;860 million of charges and &#36;395 million of annual cost savings from the deal. It expects to close up to 230 offices and cut several hundred jobs for brokers with lesser training. A.G. Edwards will pay Wachovia &#36;270 million if the deal falls apart. Credit Suisse, Wachovia&#39;s investment bank and the law firm Simpson Thacher & Bartlett LLP represented Wachovia. Goldman Sachs & Co. and the law firm Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz represented A.G. Edwards. (Additional reporting by Michael Flaherty and Tim McLaughlin) Economy nearly stalled in first quarter Wachovia to buy A.G. Edwards for &#36;6.8B Northwest exits bankruptcy protection Stocks up after takeover news, GDP data FDA nixes fast track for cancer vaccine Economy nearly stalled in first quarter Wellpoint CFO ousted, violated code of conduct Leaner Northwest Airlines exits bankruptcy First-quarter growth weak, future looks brighter Northwest exits bankruptcy protection Wal-Mart Report Spells Trouble AM ET Dell to sell &#39;in Wal-Mart&#39; BBC AM ET College Loan Rates to Increase AM ET Traders floored by NYSE change CNN - PM ET Make Money in Growth Stocks. We have a Winner for You. Online Currency Trading - Free Demo 24-Hour trading, award-winning software, charts and more from GFT. Invest in Land in Texas Build Your Dream Home on Hilltop, Wooded or Waterfront Land in Texas. The Wachovia headquarters in Charlotte, North Carolina in an undated file photo. Wachovia Corp. on... - Financial/Banking Industry GM plant is nation&#39;s most productive Silicon Insider: High Tech Labor Day S&P&#39;s run: A record for a new era Optimists take charge, and summer interns rule. &raquo; Read Today's Column Get advice on how to manage the outcome of your income. &raquo; More from Yahoo! Finance Get the latest news, features and photos. Limited. or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostemailed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/hurricane_forecast 9 Atlantic hurricanes forecast for 2007 of the Web 9 Atlantic hurricanes forecast for 2007 2 hours, 42 minutes ago FORT COLLINS, Colo. - With the 2007 Atlantic hurricane season a few hours away, researcher William Gray released his newest forecast Thursday still showing an expectation for 17 named storms and nine hurricanes, five of them intense. Gray, based at Colorado State University, described it as a very active season. He said there was a 74 percent chance of a major hurricane making landfall somewhere on the U.S. coast. There is a 50 percent chance of a major hurricane making landfall on the East Coast, including the Florida Peninsula, according to the new forecast; the long-term average is 31 percent. The chance of a major hurricane hitting the Gulf Coast between the Florida Panhandle and Brownsville, Texas, is 49 percent; the long-term average is 30 percent. There is also an above-average chance of a major hurricane making landfall in the Caribbean, according to the forecast. Thursday's forecast was largely unchanged from Gray's last forecast, released in early April. "We expect an above-average hurricane season," said Phil Klotzbach, a member of Gray's team and lead author of the forecast. The Atlantic hurricane season, which runs from June 1 to Nov. 30, averages 9.6 named storms, 5.9 hurricanes and 2.3 intense hurricanes per year. There were 10 named Atlantic storms last year and five hurricanes, two of them major. None of the hurricanes hit the U.S. Atlantic coast. The devastating 2005 season set a record with 28 named storms, 15 of them hurricanes. Four hurricanes hit the U.S. coast, the worst among them Katrina, which devastated parts of the Gulf Coast. Full Coverage: Tropical Storms and Hurricanes Tropical Storm Barbara weakens in Mexico AP, 2 minutes ago Poll: Coast not ready for hurricanes AP, 1 hour, 43 minutes ago Drones Expected to Be New Eye Into Little-Seen Part of Hurricanes at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), Oct 03 Your pictures: Preparing for Florence at BBC, Sep 11 Study Finds Hurricanes Frequent in Some Cooler Periods Coastal areas brace for a busy season with 7 to 10 hurricanes forecast at Sun Sentinel, May 22 By any other name at The American Spectator, Sep 30 The next one kind as Ernesto at Miami Herald (reg. req'd), Aug 31 TB patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 Alabama gov. signs slavery apology N.H. governor signs civil unions law Dedication set for Billy Graham library TB on a plane? Sign of the times TB on a plane? Sign of the times N.H. governor signs civil unions law Crusader's son arrested on sex charge Alabama gov. signs slavery apology Marine vet faces hearing over protest TB patient moved to Denver hospital AP - 21 minutes ago Children hanged: Language barrier slows 911 call AP - 42 minutes ago King of Spam Blocked minutes ago Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 AP minutes ago Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. Proenza, new director of the National Hurricane Center, talks to the media next to... Tropical Storms and Hurricanes Engineering students are simulating a hurricane&#39;s winds to build better houses. CNN&#39;s John Zarrella reports. (May 29) &raquo; More CNN video &raquo; Show all news video and Tropical Storms TB patient moved to Denver hospital The Note: Testing Fred Thompson Ala. students graduate in wake of vicious storm PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_en_mo/harry_potter_park Harry Potter theme park headed to Fla. Potter theme park headed to Fla. By LINDSEY TOLER, Associated Press Writer 1 hour, 1 minute ago LONDON - Universal Studios is opening up a theme park in Florida &#151; complete with the Hogwarts School of Witchcraft and Wizardry, the Forbidden Forest and Hogsmeade village. "The Wizarding World of Harry Potter," will open in late 2009 in Orlando, officials said Thursday. "The plans I've seen look incredibly exciting, and I don't think fans of the books or films will be disappointed," said author , who has been working with a creative team to make sure the park resembles the books and films. More than a dozen artists and designers lead by Stuart Craig, the production designer of the movies, have set up house in the studio where the movies are being filmed to make sure every detail is considered, according to Scott Trowbridge of Universal. "We're really going to the people who know this world best to ensure that level of authenticity," he said. The Potter park will allow visitors to view the iconic locations in Rowling's magical world, like Dumbledore's office in Hogwarts and the shops in Hogsmeade. Some locations may be in upcoming books, Trowbridge said. Trowbridge said while there would not be any character lookalikes at the park, fans wanting to see Harry Potter and his magical friends wouldn't leave disappointed. "This is Harry's world," said Trowbridge. "Most every fan wants to have an encounter with the star of the show." The Harry Potter book series has been translated into 65 languages with more than 325 million copies sold in over 200 territories around the world. The fifth film in the series, "Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix," will be released in theatres on 13 July. The seventh and final book of the series will be released on 21 July. Harry Potter theme park headed to Fla. Richie fears she may go to jail too Lohan's dad: Lindsay hooked on OxyContin New 'Potter' to open sooner than planned Thompson won't be back on 'Law & Order' Lovitz, Laugh Factory make lifelong deal Lohan's dad: Lindsay hooked on OxyContin New 'Potter' to open sooner than planned Thompson won't be back on 'Law & Order' WOMAN OUT OF WHEELCHAIR IS IGNORED BY PASSERS-BY Lohan&#39;s dad: Lindsay hooked on OxyContin AP - 38 minutes ago Jackson items under hammer BBC AM ET Thursday&#39;s live music lineup CNN AM ET Theme park for Potter fans BBC AM ET Find Adventure at Disney Experience a Disney Vacation. Order a Free Vacation Planning DVD. Buy a Universal Orlando Vacation, Get 7 days of Unlimited Admission. 1000 Raffle Tickets - $45, Free Shipping 500 for $40, 1000 for $45, 2000 for $75, 3000 for $105, 4000 for $135, 5000 for $16.5, additional 1000s only $27. Custom printed & shipped free within 24 hrs. Ask about next day delivery. Hogwarts Castle - 'The Wizarding World of Harry Potter' will be anchored by the most... Theme park for Potter fans A theme park based on the boy wizard Harry Potter is to be built in Orlando, Florida. &raquo; More BBC video &raquo; Show all news video News - AP a living out of LEGO How Do You Spell Success? Can you wrap your head around the bandanna? Vote for your favorite movie spoof. Whitney Matheson blogs on showbiz. &raquo; Entertainment on USAToday PEOPLE OF THE WEB One-time child star Kirk Cameron goes online to save souls.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/afp/20070531/sc_afp/chinaanimalpanda World&#39;s only human-bred panda in wild dies only human-bred panda in wild dies AM ET BEIJING (AFP) - The only giant panda released into the wild after being bred in captivity has died, setting back China&#39;s efforts to save the critically endangered species, state press reported Thursday. Xiang Xiang was found dead in February on snow-covered ground after apparently being mauled by wild male pandas protecting their territory, the official Xinhua news agency said. The five-year-old was bred in captivity at the Wolong Nature Reserve in China&#39;s southwestern Sichuan province and released into the wild in April last year, but proved unable to cope with real-life conditions. "We chose Xiang Xiang because we thought that a strong male panda would have a better chance of surviving in the harsh natural environment," said the reserve&#39;s deputy director, Li Desheng. "But the other male pandas clearly saw Xiang Xiang as a threat." Xiang Xiang, which means "Auspicious", underwent three years of training before his release, learning to build a den, forage for food and mark his territory, but not how to fight well enough. "We have to give captive-bred pandas better survival training, especially combat and defence skills," Xinhua quoted reserve vetenarian Yang Chunxiang as saying. Giant pandas are the world&#39;s most endangered species, with just 1,590 living in the wild, mostly in the mountains of Sichuan, and more than 210 in captivity, according to Xinhua. In 2003, China began teaching the animals bred in captivity to live in the their natural environment so that the population in the wild would grow. Xinhua described Xiang Xiang&#39;s death as a "major setback" for those efforts but officials said more pandas would be released into the wild. "We are all sad about Xiang Xiang, but it doesn&#39;t mean the project has failed," said Zhang Hemin, head of the China Giant Panda Protection and Research Center in Wolong. "The lessons we have learnt from what happened to Xiang Xiang will help us adapt and improve the project." Xinhua said the announcement of Xiang Xiang&#39;s death was delayed until a full investigation had been completed. Full Coverage: Endangered and Threatened Species Freed Chinese panda dies in wild Palm oil puts squeeze on Asia's endangered orangutan Reuters Rhinos running out of space - conservationists Reuters Scientists seek approval to kill sharks AP Pulling species from the brink at BBC, Mar 19 Macquarie's feral cats: a delicate ecological balance at The Independent (UK), Feb 21 A Fungus Brings Dinosaurs Fate to Frogs 21 President Bush v. polar bears at Albuquerque Tribune, Jan 09 9 Atlantic hurricanes forecast for 2007 Space station gets protective shielding Calif. whales provide new information Panda that was released into wild dies Ban on selling wildlife may fuel trade Finger length may foretell academic potential Who Sleeps Around? Scientists Know Space station gets protective shielding Scientists seek approval to kill sharks Shields Up! Cosmonauts Install Protective Space Station Panels Weather & Science Video AccuWeather minutes ago Elliot&#39;s Elaboration - Elliot Abrams AccuWeather minutes ago Storm Outlook for Friday AccuWeather minutes ago Storm Outlook for Thursday AccuWeather minutes ago Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Xiang Xiang the panda climbs a tree at the Wolong Nature Reserve in China&#39;s southwestern... Captive Panda Found Dead in Wild Panda born in captivity and then released into the wild was found dead. &raquo; More ABC News video Panda dies after release from captivity A 5-year-old panda - who last year became the first to be released into the wild after being bred in captivity - has died. (May 31) &raquo; More AP video &raquo; Show all news video & Pets News Rare rhino death leaves only 13 worldwide Wayward whales closing in on Golden Gate Sci-fi writers join war on terror SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Are cicadas crawling out of the ground at your house? Submit your photos to You Witness News. Track innovations in science, health and technology. Explore the world's wonders and the battle to save them. The most popular science news stories and photos. &raquo; All Most Popular . France Presse.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostemailed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070530/sc_nm/finger_length_dc Finger length may foretell academic potential length may foretell academic potential PM ET NEW YORK (Reuters Health) - The length of children&#39;s fingers may hint at their natural abilities in math and language, a new study suggests. In a study of 75 children between the ages of 6 and 7 years old, researchers found that finger length correlated with how well the children performed on standardized tests of math and verbal skills. Specifically, boys whose index fingers were short compared with their ring fingers tended to excel at numbers and girls with index and ring fingers of similar length tended to do better on the verbal portion of the test. The findings are reported in the British Journal of Psychology. A number of studies have now found that "digit ratio," or the length of the index finger compared with the ring finger, is connected to cognitive performance, some personality traits, athletic prowess and the risk of certain medical conditions. Researchers believe hormones explain the findings. Finger length is thought to be determined in the womb, with exposures to testosterone and estrogen playing a key role. Greater testosterone exposure appears to result in a shorter index finger relative to the ring finger, while estrogen encourages more equality between the two fingers. Prenatal hormone exposure is also thought to influence brain development. "Testosterone has been argued to promote development of the areas of the brain which are often associated with spatial and mathematical skills," study leader, Dr. Mark Brosnan, explained in a statement. Estrogen, in turn, is thought to affect brain areas involved in language ability, noted Brosnan, who heads the psychology department at the University of Bath in the UK. Therefore, finger length may serve as a marker of fetal hormone exposures, and possibly our inborn math and language abilities. No one is saying that finger measurements should replace SAT tests, Brosnan added. But finger length does offer "an interesting insight into our innate abilities in key cognitive areas." SOURCE: British Journal of Psychology, May 2007. 9 Atlantic hurricanes forecast for 2007 Space station gets protective shielding Calif. whales provide new information Panda that was released into wild dies Ban on selling wildlife may fuel trade World&#39;s only human-bred panda in wild dies Who Sleeps Around? Scientists Know Space station gets protective shielding Scientists seek approval to kill sharks Shields Up! Cosmonauts Install Protective Space Station Panels Weather & Science Video AccuWeather minutes ago Elliot&#39;s Elaboration - Elliot Abrams AccuWeather minutes ago Storm Outlook for Friday AccuWeather minutes ago Storm Outlook for Thursday AccuWeather minutes ago with Bad Credit refinance requests only. A stock broker's fingers key in the day's proceedings on a keyboard in Mumbai, India,... Rare rhino death leaves only 13 worldwide Wayward whales closing in on Golden Gate Sci-fi writers join war on terror SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Are cicadas crawling out of the ground at your house? Submit your photos to You Witness News. Track innovations in science, health and technology. Explore the world's wonders and the battle to save them. The most popular science news stories and photos. &raquo; All Most Popular Limited. or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostemailed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_eu/russia_putin Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race U.S. has triggered new arms race By VLADIMIR ISACHENKOV, Associated Press Writer 1 hour, 58 minutes ago said Thursday that tests of new Russian missiles were a response to the planned deployment of U.S. missile defense installations and other forces in Europe, suggesting Washington has triggered a new arms race. In a clear reference to the United States, he harshly criticized "imperialism" in global affairs and warned that Russia will strengthen its military potential to maintain a global strategic balance. "It wasn't us who initiated a new round of arms race," Putin said when asked about Russia's missile tests at a news conference after talks in the Kremlin with Greek President Karolos Papoulias. Putin described Tuesday's tests of a new ballistic missile capable of carrying multiple nuclear warheads and a new cruise missile as part of the Russian response to the planned deployment of new U.S. military bases and missile defense sites in ex-Soviet satellites in Central and Eastern Europe. He assailed the United States and other members for failing to ratify an amended version of the 1990 Conventional Forces in Europe (CFE) treaty, which limits the deployment of heavy non-nuclear weapons around the continent. "We have signed and ratified the CFE and are fully implementing it. We have pulled out all our heavy weapons from the European part of Russia to (locations) behind the Ural Mountains and cut our military by 300,000 men," Putin said. "And what about our partners? They are filling Eastern Europe with new weapons. A new base in Bulgaria, another one in Romania, a (missile defense) site in Poland and a radar in the Czech Republic," he said. "What we are supposed to do? We can't just sit back and look at that." Putin and other Russian officials have repeatedly rejected U.S. assurances that the planned missile defense installations are meant to counter a potential threat from nations such as and pose no danger to Russia. Putin reaffirmed his warning that Russia would opt out of the CFE treaty altogether if NATO nations fail to ratify its amended version. "Either you ratify the treaty and start observing it, or we will opt out of it," Putin said. In remarks clearly directed against Washington, Putin blasted those "who want to dictate their will to all others regardless of international norms and law." "It's dangerous and harmful," he added. "Norms of the international law were replaced with political expediency. We view it as diktat and imperialism." Russia this week initiated an international conference to be held in Austria in early June to discuss the situation around the CFE treaty. Putin described the tests of new missiles conducted by Russia on Tuesday as a necessary response to the Western action. "There is no reason to fear these actions by Russia, they aren't aggressive. It's merely a response to tough and unfounded unilateral actions by our partners," he said. "These actions are aimed at preserving a global balance." In one missile test Tuesday, a prototype of new Russia's intercontinental ballistic missile, called the RS-24, was fired from a mobile launcher at the Plesetsk launch site in northwestern Russia and its test warhead landed on target 3,400 miles away on the Far Eastern Kamchatka Peninsula, officials said. Russia's military also tested a new cruise missile based on the existing short-range Iskander missile. "We will keep modernizing our potential," Putin said. Russian suspect says British secret service killed Litvinenko AFP, 28 minutes ago Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death AP, 1 hour, 39 minutes ago Project born in the Cold War at Daily Telegraph (UK), May 29 Wealth gap leaves rural Russia behind Russia blames US in missile row Suspect Accuses British in Spy's Death Killing the Russian Media at The Economist, Apr 26 Iraq residents rise up against al-Qaida Hezbollah, Syria denounce U.N. tribunal Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death U.S.: Dead detainee was of high value Blair: G-8 must keep pledges to Africa Panda released into wild found dead There&#39;s something in the air in Rome: cocaine Putin issues sharp warning to US, vows to counter &#39;imperialism&#39; Iraq residents rise up against al-Qaida Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death Captive Panda Found Dead in Wild minutes ago Removal of Bullet Alleviates Headache minutes ago Spain fights for rights to shipwreck booty AP minute ago minutes ago Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. President Vladimir Putin, left, speaks at a news conference after a meeting with Greek... Russian President Vladimir Putin News - AP surgeon as president Ex-KGB spy: UK tried to recruit me Missing Girl&#39;s Parents Blessed By Pontiff Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center
http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070531/ts_nm/arts_potter_dc All aboard for the Harry Potter rollercoaster aboard for the Harry Potter rollercoaster AM ET LONDON (Reuters) - J.K Rowling, who became the world&#39;s first billion dollar author on the back of &#39;s success, has given the go-ahead for the creation of a Florida theme park dedicated to the schoolboy wizard. "The plans I have seen look incredibly exciting and I don&#39;t think fans of the books or films will be disappointed," Rowling said of the Orlando park that is scheduled to open in 2009. The park is a joint venture between Warner Bros Entertainment, whose Potter films have so far grossed more than &#36;3.5 billion worldwide, and Universal Orlando Resort. In a statement rich in entertainment hyperbole, the builders of "The Wizarding World of Harry Potter" said they planned to "create the world&#39;s first immersive Harry Potter themed environment." Barry Meyer, chairman and CEO of Warner Bros. Entertainment, said: "Over the years we&#39;ve received thousands of letters from fans around the world wishing they could visit Hogwarts (School) and the wonderful locations described in each of The park&#39;s opening could help to quell the withdrawal symptoms of Potter fans around the globe who have bought 320 million copies of her wizard tales and turned every one of the films into a box office hit. Pottermania is set to scale new heights in July with the last novel hitting the bookstands and the latest film being launched in a deluge of global publicity. "Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows," the final installment in her hugely successful series, is being released on July 21. Rowling is to mark publication with a moonlight reading for fans at London&#39;s Natural History Museum. Sweepstakes are being conducted by her British publisher Bloomsbury Publishing Plc and American publisher Scholastic to pick the winning fans. "Harry Potter and the order of the Phoenix," the fifth film in a blockbuster series based on the books, is being given its official world premiere in London on July 3. Rowling, whose books are always released under tight security, has said two characters will die in the seventh and final book but she has refused to give any clues. The author has appealed to people to keep the end a secret: "I want the readers who have, in many instances, grown up with Harry, to embark on the last adventure they will share with him without knowing where they are going." U.S. authors John Irving and Stephen King were so worried about the fictional hero&#39;s fate that they urged Rowling to spare the bespectacled hero. Full Coverage: Harry Potter Rowling to give reading of new Potter AP Japanese debut for Potter movie Harry Potter film to premiere in Tokyo AP Harry Potter gets stamp of approval Reuters Harry Potter and the mystery of an academic obsession at The Guardian (UK)., Aug 06 'I'll miss Harry' says JK Rowling at BBC, Aug 02 Harry Potter and Our Forgotten History at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), Jul 28 J.K. Rowling critic would be dead if recent e-mails were really fire-breathing dragons at San Francisco Chronicle, Jul 26 Economy nearly stalled in first quarter TB patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 N.H. governor signs civil unions law Iraq residents rise up against al-Qaida Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race Most Viewed: Top Stories U.S. "imperialism" means new arms race: Putin Bush unveils climate strategy ahead of G8 U.S. says fourth Iranian American detained in Iran May toll for U.S. soldiers in Iraq climbs to 122 China scientists shed new light on male infertility Punta Gorda: 3 Years Later AM ET hours, 20 minutes ago New Study Links Cancer To Ground Zero Toxins CBS 2 New York AM ET Panda dies after release from captivity AP AM ET British author JK Rowling, who created the bestselling Harry Potter series, wears her graduation gown... Theme park for Potter fans A theme park based on the boy wizard Harry Potter is to be built in Orlando, Florida. &raquo; More BBC video &raquo; Show all news video Get answer for my critics Hershey Vs. Pot Dealer in Trademark Suit Ala. students graduate in wake of vicious storm People of the Web A violent video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. Limited. or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon.
http://news.yahoo.com/i/964 Most popular news stories as ranked by readers of Yahoo! News Why so few bomb-safe US military trucks in Iraq? The Christian Science Monitor AM ET Washington - One senior officer calls it a "moral imperative," and others see it as a no-brainer, but four years into a deadly war, there are only some 350 blast-resistant trucks protecting US troops in Iraq. Officials inside and outside the military want to know why. All aboard for the Harry Potter rollercoaster AM ET LONDON (Reuters) - J.K Rowling, who became the world&#39;s first billion dollar author on the back of Harry Potter&#39;s success, has given the go-ahead for the creation of a Florida theme park dedicated to the schoolboy wizard. Man described as a top spammer arrested AM ET SEATTLE - A 27-year-old man described as one of the world's most prolific spammers was arrested Wednesday, and federal authorities said computer users across the Web could notice a decrease in the amount of junk e-mail. Panda released into wild found dead AM ET BEIJING - The first panda to be released into bamboo forests after being bred in captivity has died, and a Chinese nature preserve official said Thursday it may have fallen from trees while being chased by wild pandas. World&#39;s only human-bred panda in wild dies AM ET BEIJING (AFP) - The only giant panda released into the wild after being bred in captivity has died, setting back China&#39;s efforts to save the critically endangered species, state press reported Thursday. Finger length may foretell academic potential PM ET NEW YORK (Reuters Health) - The length of children&#39;s fingers may hint at their natural abilities in math and language, a new study suggests. There&#39;s something in the air in Rome: cocaine 2 hours, 9 minutes ago ROME (Reuters) - Scientists have discovered particles of cocaine and marijuana, as well as caffeine and tobacco, in the air of Italy&#39;s capital, they said on Thursday. Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race 1 hour, 58 minutes ago MOSCOW - President Vladimir Putin said Thursday that tests of new Russian missiles were a response to the planned deployment of U.S. missile defense installations and other forces in Europe, suggesting Washington has triggered a new arms race. Economy nearly stalled in first quarter 1 hour, 40 minutes ago WASHINGTON - The economy nearly stalled in the first quarter with growth slowing to a pace of just 0.6 percent. That was the worst three-month showing in over four years. CDC seeks those who sat near TB patient AM ET ATLANTA - Health officials in North America and Europe sought passenger lists Wednesday for two trans-Atlantic airline flights in their effort to find about 80 people who sat near a honeymooner infected with a dangerous drug-resistant form of tuberculosis. Harry Potter theme park headed to Fla. 1 hour, 2 minutes ago LONDON - Universal Studios is opening up a Harry Potter theme park in Florida &#151; complete with the Hogwarts School of Witchcraft and Wizardry, the Forbidden Forest and Hogsmeade village. Panda released into wild found dead AM ET BEIJING - The first panda to be released into bamboo forests after being bred in captivity has died, and a Chinese nature preserve official said Thursday it may have fallen from trees while being chased by wild pandas. Lovitz, Laugh Factory make lifelong deal AM ET LOS ANGELES - Jon Lovitz has made a lifelong commitment &#151; to the Laugh Factory. Man described as a top spammer arrested AM ET SEATTLE - A 27-year-old man described as one of the world's most prolific spammers was arrested Wednesday, and federal authorities said computer users across the Web could notice a decrease in the amount of junk e-mail. Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race 1 hour, 58 minutes ago MOSCOW - President Vladimir Putin said Thursday that tests of new Russian missiles were a response to the planned deployment of U.S. missile defense installations and other forces in Europe, suggesting Washington has triggered a new arms race. CDC seeks those who sat near TB patient AM ET ATLANTA - Health officials in North America and Europe sought passenger lists Wednesday for two trans-Atlantic airline flights in their effort to find about 80 people who sat near a honeymooner infected with a dangerous drug-resistant form of tuberculosis. Cease-fire eyed to stop violence in Iraq 1 hour, 4 minutes ago WASHINGTON - U.S. military commanders are talking with Iraqi militants about cease-fires and other arrangements to try to stop the violence, the No. 2 American commander said Thursday. There&#39;s something in the air in Rome: cocaine 2 hours, 9 minutes ago ROME (Reuters) - Scientists have discovered particles of cocaine and marijuana, as well as caffeine and tobacco, in the air of Italy&#39;s capital, they said on Thursday. Richie fears she may go to jail too 1 hour, 6 minutes ago LOS ANGELES - Nicole Richie admits she's "nervous" about the possibility she may follow her friend Paris Hilton to jail. TB on a plane? Sign of the times 2 hours, 17 minutes ago ATLANTA - SARS on a plane. Mumps on a plane. And now a rare and deadly form of tuberculosis, on at least two planes. Commercial air travel's potential for spreading infection continues to cause handwringing among public health officials, as news of a jet-setting man with a rare and deadly form of TB demonstrates. U.S. says fourth Iranian American detained in Iran 1 hour, 18 minutes ago WASHINGTON (Reuters) - Iran has detained a fourth Iranian American, California businessman Ali Shakeri, the U.S. State Department said on Thursday, calling his arrest a "disturbing pattern" of harassment of dual citizens. Why so few bomb-safe US military trucks in Iraq? The Christian Science Monitor AM ET Washington - One senior officer calls it a "moral imperative," and others see it as a no-brainer, but four years into a deadly war, there are only some 350 blast-resistant trucks protecting US troops in Iraq. Officials inside and outside the military want to know why. Turkish general: Ready for PKK strike AM ET ANKARA, Turkey - Turkey's top general said Thursday the military was ready to stage a cross-border offensive to fight Kurdish guerrillas in Iraq and that he already had sought government approval to mount military action. Cease-fire eyed to stop violence in Iraq 1 hour, 4 minutes ago WASHINGTON - U.S. military commanders are talking with Iraqi militants about cease-fires and other arrangements to try to stop the violence, the No. 2 American commander said Thursday. Judge will release letters in Libby case WASHINGTON - A federal judge said Thursday he will release more than 150 letters he received regarding next week's sentencing of former White House aide I. Lewis "Scooter" Libby. Dems plan vote on stem cell research PM ET WASHINGTON - Congress intends to send President Bush legislation next week to ease restrictions on federally funded embryonic stem cell research, inviting his second veto in as many years on the subject. Iraq&#39;s bloodiest month for US troops since Fallujah invasion 1 hour, 47 minutes ago BAGHDAD (AFP) - Six more US soldiers have been killed in Iraq, the military announced on Thursday, confirming that May has become the deadliest month for American forces in two-and-a-half years. May toll for U.S. soldiers in Iraq climbs to 122 1 hour, 41 minutes ago BAGHDAD (Reuters) - The U.S. military reported three more deaths in Iraq on Thursday, taking the death toll to 122 for May, already the worst month for U.S. forces there in more than two years. U.S. deaths in Afghanistan, region PM ET As of Wednesday, May 30, 2007, at least 325 members of the U.S. military have died in Afghanistan, Pakistan and Uzbekistan as a result of the U.S. invasion of Afghanistan in late 2001, according to the Defense Department. The department last updated its figures May 26, 2007. NATO says hostile fire may have caused crash AM ET KABUL (Reuters) - NATO forces in Afghanistan said on Thursday Taliban fire may have brought down its military helicopter in which the alliance said seven soldiers were killed. The Taliban said 35 people died. Schwarzenegger, Ontario premier in stem cell deal PM ET TORONTO (Reuters) - Ontario and California will work together to develop new stem cell therapies to help conquer cancer, and will cooperate on curbing greenhouse gas emission, the leaders of the two regions said on Wednesday. View Most Popular stories and photos by date. in Mexico City&#39;s Auditorio Nacional May 28, 2007. Guimaraes was the first runner up. REUTERS/Andrew Winning (MEXICO)" height="130" width="103" border="0" title="Miss Brazil Natalia Guimaraes poses during the swimwear section ..."/> poses as she arrives at the Clive Davis pre-Grammy party in Beverly Hills February 12, 2005 file photo. Delaney stars in "Army Wives," a dramatized the lives of soldiers fighting a war while the fighting was still taking place. REUTERS/Fred Prouser" height="130" width="72" border="0" title="Actress Kim Delaney poses as she arrives at the Clive Davis ..."/> at Sunset Boulevard and Foothill Road, right rear, in Beverly Hills, Calif, Tuesday, May 29, 2007. Lohan was arrested on suspicion of driving under the influence after her convertible struck a curb in Beverly Hills, and investigators found what they believe is cocaine at the scene, police said. (AP Photo/Reed Saxon)" height="77" width="130" border="0" title="Without leaving his car, a man takes a mobile phone photo of ..."/> final in Mexico City&#39;s Auditorio Nacional May 28, 2007. Guimaraes was the first runner up. REUTERS/Andrew Winning (MEXICO)" height="130" width="103" border="0" title="Miss Brazil Natalia Guimaraes poses during the swimwear section ..."/> ), R-Calif.; Rep. Tim Murphy, R-Pa.; Rep. Rick Renzi ( ), R-Ariz.; and Rep. Ken Calvert ( ), R-Calif. Bottom row, from left are, Rep. John Doolittle ( ), R-Calif.; Rep. Jerry Lewis ( ), R-Calif.; Rep. William Jefferson ( ), D-La.; and Rep. Alan Mollohan ( ), D-W.Va. (AP Photo/File)" height="89" width="130" border="0" title="Various file photos of House members under investigation by ..."/> in an undated photo. A helicopter crashed in southern Afghanistan on Wednesday, a spokesman for the International Security Assistance Force said. REUTERS/File" height="86" width="130" border="0" title="A Chinook in Afghanistan in an undated photo. A NATO helicopter ..."/> Russian President Vladimir Putin about
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostemailed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_go_ca_st_pe/us_iraq Cease-fire eyed to stop violence in Iraq eyed to stop violence in Iraq By PAULINE JELINEK, Associated Press Writer 1 hour, 4 minutes ago WASHINGTON - U.S. military commanders are talking with Iraqi militants about cease-fires and other arrangements to try to stop the violence, the No. 2 American commander said Thursday. And he suggested he might not be able to strictly meet the September deadline for telling Congress whether 's military build up in Lt. Gen. Raymond Odierno said commanders at all levels are being empowered to reach out for talks with militants, tribes, religious leaders and others in the country that has been gripped by violence on a range of fronts including insurgents, sectarian rivals and common criminals. "It's just beginning, so we have a lot of work to do in this," he said. "But we have restructured ourselves ... to work this issue." He said he thinks 80 percent of Iraqis &#151; including Sunni insurgents and Shia militants &#151; can reach reconciliation with each other, though most al-Qaida operatives won't. "We are talking about cease-fires, and maybe signing some things that say they won't conduct operations against the government of Iraq or against coalition forces.," Odierno told reporters in a video conference from Baghdad. On the assessment of operations that is due in September, he said he thinks it will take longer to tell whether the increase of nearly 30,000 troops will work as intended &#151; that is, to quell violence enough to give Iraqi officials breathing space to work on reconciliation and development issues. "The way I understand it, is we're going to be required to provide an assessment in September. So I will provide my assessment," Odierno said, adding it might not be complete. He said he will be able to assess the work of forces that arrived for the beginning of the build up in February, but that the ones just arrived this week won't be in place for a couple of weeks &#151; meaning it will be August before he might be able to tell how they're doing. "So that'll be the first time I'll be able to make a real initial assessment of the true affect of the surge," he said. "The assessment might be 'I need a little more time. ' The assessment might be, 'I've seen enough, and it's effective or I've seen enough, and it's not going to be effective.' "Right now if you asked me, I would tell you I'll probably need a little bit more time to do a true assessment," he said. "If I think I might need a little bit more time, I will give an assessment saying, 'But I'd like to have more time'," Odierno said. He said the increased effort by commanders to reach out to militants goes hand in hand with reconciliation efforts by the Iraqi government. Odierno noted that efforts to engage tribal leaders in Anbar province &#151; who have been turning against al-Qaida there &#151; has helped draw people to serve in the Iraqi security forces in record numbers and has helped reduce attacks there. For example, the attacks in Anbar in May 2006 totaled 811, while this May they were just barely over 400, Odierno said. Since the beginning of 2007, over 12,000 Iraqi citizens have volunteered for Iraqi security forces in Anbar. In all of 2006, only 1,000 had volunteered. Prime Minister Nouri al-Maliki and other leaders are under increasing pressure from Washington to do more to achieve reconciliation among factions because, officials argue, no amount of military force can bring peace to the country without political peace. Al-Maliki announced a national reconciliation proposal nearly a year ago that has made limited progress. It offered some amnesty to members of the Sunni-led insurgency and a change in a law that had removed senior members of 's Baath Party from their jobs. "I believe there are elements that are irreconcilable, but I believe the large majority are," Odierno said. "I believe about 80 percent are reconcilable, both Jaish al-Mahdi as well as Sunni insurgents," though very few of al-Qaida. "There will be always people that are irreconcilable and ... the Iraqi government, with our support, will have to continue to conduct operations against those forces," he said. "Prime Minister Maliki and the government of Iraq have to continue to reach out to all these groups ... bringing these groups into the political process so we can deal with their differences in a peaceful way instead of in violent ways,:" Odierno said. Associated Press Writer Lolita Baldor contributed to this report. Iraq bomber kills 20, Sunni militants clash Reuters, 29 minutes ago Iraq residents rise up against al-Qaida AP, 32 minutes ago Where life is cheap and easy to take at Daily Telegraph (UK), May 30 Life in a remote US Army outpost in Iraq: IEDs, DVDs, and A/C The Christian Science Monitor Many killed in Iraq suicide bomb Search continues for Iraq Britons The Hard Truth About Leaving Iraq RealClearPolitics Bush calls for global emissions goals Edwards wants probe of high gas prices N.H. governor signs civil unions law Bush sees South Korea model for Iraq Sen. Clinton defends private jet travel Sen. Clinton defends private jet travel Boost biofuels, cut U.S. farm aid: ex-Senate leaders Rice holds line on Iran nuclear program Bush sees South Korea model for Iraq Thompson moves toward White House bid Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 AP minutes ago CNN minutes ago Stephanopoulos on Fred Thompson AM ET Raw Politics: Watchdogs barking CNN AM ET with Bad Credit refinance requests only. Residents of Sadr city, Baghdad inspect a damaged car after a joint U.S.-Iraqi forces raid,... House News - AP 15 nations to set global emissions goal Brinkley Describes Reagan&#39;s Inner Narrative Bush calls for global emissions goals "What would you include in legislation to address global warming?" Offer your ideas. SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. &raquo; More from Congressional Quarterly People of the Web A gay blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostemailed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_he_me/tuberculosis_infection CDC seeks those who sat near TB patient seeks those who sat near TB patient By MIKE STOBBE, AP Medical Writer AM ET ATLANTA - Health officials in North America and Europe sought passenger lists Wednesday for two trans-Atlantic airline flights in their effort to find about 80 people who sat near a honeymooner infected with a dangerous drug-resistant form of tuberculosis. Authorities also disclosed that the man was on several flights between various European locales over the course of two weeks earlier this month. Passengers lists for those flights were also being tracked down, they said. "The investigation is just beginning. It's very challenging," said Dr. Martin Cetron, director of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention's division of global migration and quarantine. The man, who is under the first U.S. government-ordered quarantine since 1963, told a newspaper he flew from Atlanta to Greece for a wedding and then traveled to Italy for a honeymoon. Later he flew back to North America because he feared he might die without treatment in the United States. officials are concentrating on the trans-Atlantic flights, when the likelihood of spreading the disease was greatest because he was in a confined space with other people for hours. Officials were trying to contact 27 crew members and about 80 passengers who sat in the five rows surrounding the man for testing. Other passengers on the flights are not considered at high risk of infection because tests indicated the amount of TB bacteria in the man was low, Cetron said. "Our big concern is that no one has told us which row he might have sat on," passenger Shannon Boccard, whose 10-year-old son was on the same flight, told WSB-TV in Atlanta. Health officials in France have asked Air France-KLM for passenger lists, and the Italian Health Ministry also is tracing the man's movements. A spokeswoman for Czech airline CSA said medical checks showed no infections among its crew members who flew with the man, but the airline was contacting passengers. The man had a supply of masks to wear for the protection of other passengers, but it is not clear whether he donned them, Cetron said. The man continues to feel well and shows no symptoms, Cetron said. The man told The Atlanta Journal-Constitution that doctors did not order him not to fly and only suggested he put off his long-planned wedding. He knew he had a form of tuberculosis and that it was resistant to commonly used drugs, but he did not realize until he was already in Europe that it could be so dangerous, he said. The man's wife has tested negative. "We headed off to Greece thinking everything's fine," he told the newspaper. The newspaper did not identify him at his request, because of the stigma attached to his diagnosis. He flew to Paris on May 12 aboard Air France Flight 385, also listed as Delta Air Lines codeshare Flight 8517. He and his bride took then took four more flights within Europe, flying from Paris to Athens on May 14; from Athens to Thira Island on May 16; from Mykonos Island to Athens on May 21; and from Athens to Rome on May 21. The passengers on the shorter European hops are not considered to be at the same level of risk for infection as the passengers on the trans-Atlantic flights, which each lasted eight hours or more, CDC officials said. While he was in Rome, health authorities reached him with the news that further tests had revealed his TB was a rare, "extensively drug-resistant" form, far more dangerous than he knew. They told him to turn himself over to Italian health officials and not to fly on any commercial airlines. Instead, on May 24, the man flew from Rome to Prague on Czech Air Flight 0727. From Prague, the couple left for Montreal the same day, aboard Czech Air Flight 0104, according to CDC officials. The man then drove into the United States at Champlain, N.Y. He told the newspaper he was afraid that if he did not get back to the U.S., he wouldn't get the treatment he needed to survive. The man is now at Atlanta's Grady Memorial Hospital under the first federal quarantine order since the government quarantined a patient with smallpox in 1963. A sheriff's deputy was assigned to guard him. He is not facing prosecution, health officials said. A spokesman for Denver's National Jewish Hospital, which specializes in respiratory disorders, said Wednesday that the man would be treated there. It was not clear when he would arrive. Associated Press writers Daniel Yee in Atlanta and Colleen Slevin in Denver contributed to this report. Public Health Agency of Canada: Full Coverage: Tuberculosis Scare TB on a plane? Sign of the times AP TB patient in Denver for treatment AP US probes how TB traveler crossed border AP Man knew he had TB before flying to Europe at CNN.com, May 30 Tuberculosis - Getting the Facts at FOX News, May 31 Upset air travelers criticize CDC on TB alert at Atlanta Journal-Constitution, May 30 TB patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 FDA nixes fast track for cancer vaccine Swiss ask Novartis to withdraw drug Cancer expected to skyrocket in Asia NFL veterans seek help for dementia FDA nixes fast track for cancer vaccine Cancer expected to skyrocket in Asia Bird flu waning but global pandemic risk still high No takers for condoms in Algeria More than half of EU adults overweight hours, 21 minutes ago Public Health Risks of TB Outbreak AM ET Passengers Onboard With TB Carrier Angry AM ET CNN AM ET with Bad Credit refinance requests only. The National Jewish Hospital in Denver is pictured Wednesday, May 30, 2007. A Georgia man... Czech officials seek passengers exposed to TB Heath officials in the Czech Republic are joining in the search for passengers who may have sat near a man infected with a drug-resistant strain of tuberculosis. (May 31) &raquo; More AP video TB and border security A man with tuberculosis eluded authorities despite orders to stop him. CNN&#39;s Jeanne Meserve reports (May 30) &raquo; More CNN video &raquo; Show all news video TB on a plane? Sign of the times gaps in Americans&#39; diet, health IQ Quarantined TB patient moved to Denver hospital ADA Moves to Increase Mouthwash Awareness Find answers on Yahoo! Health: &raquo; More from Y! Health People of the Web A grandfather- grandson team soothes souls with online hugs.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/afp/20070604/lf_afp/entertainmentdenmark Danish artist to paint Mont Blanc red - Yahoo! News Danish artist to paint Mont Blanc red AM ET COPENHAGEN (AFP) - A Danish artist known for his provocative and spectacular projects said Monday he plans to climb France&#39;s Mont Blanc to paint its summit red and establish an independent state. Marco Evaristti, originally from Chile, said he would colour the peak of Mont Blanc -- the highest mountain in western Europe --- in biodegradable paint and establish a sovereign "Pink State" on the summit in an attempt to raise awareness for environmental issues. Evaristti&#39;s guide Michel Bordet told AFP the artist had already painted a part of the mountain at the Col des Flambeaux passage, at 3,400 metres (11,150 feet) in the Vallee Blanche valley, as a "small taste of what is to come." The artist refused to reveal the exact date for his project so as "not to give police any help." "My aim is to transform this mythical mountain of Mont Blanc into a Mountain Red and establish a sovereign state, the &#39;Pink State&#39;," Evaristti told AFP. Snow-capped Mont Blanc rises to 4,808 metres (15,774 feet) in the French Alps. According to the 43-year-old artist, the purpose of his "Mont Blanc Project" is to raise questions such as: "Who owns nature? Who owns the water in the lakes, the snow on the ground, the flowers in the fields and the trees in the rain forests?". Evaristti said he has the "right" to "create a non-violent state of pluralism and tolerance" on the mountain, which "doesn&#39;t belong to France alone." "As France has taken the right to conduct nuclear testing in French Polynesia thousands of kilometres away, it would be a clear case of double-standards if they now prevented me from occupying a small piece of land for peaceful purposes," he said. The project, which "will not pollute the environment in any way", is the second in a trilogy of projects. The stunt was not expected to be well-received by the mayor of Chamonix, Michel Charlet, who in December last year called the project "stupid and illegal." "He can&#39;t say he is defending the environment and degrading a protected site at the same time," Charlet said, adding that he would send police to the mountain. In 2004 Evaristti "painted" an iceberg off Greenland red in what he called an artistic protest over nuclear waste dumped by the United States near its Thule military base in the north of the Danish island territory. The artist said earlier he had put together a 15-strong team to lug some 1,200 litres (320 gallons) of paint mixed with water up one of Mont Blanc&#39;s peaks where the liquid will be poured out to create a red mark measuring 2,500 square metres (27,000 square feet). The artist will foot the project&#39;s 50,000-euro (66,000-dollar) bill himself. Often in the headlines for his provocative projects, Evaristti caused an outcry in 2000 with an exhibit in Denmark&#39;s Trapholt modern art museum that featured gold fish swimming in blenders. Evaristti&#39;s exhibit gave visitors the choice of switching on the machine. "I wanted people to confront their consciences, their inner judgement, their instincts, to press the button of death or not," the artist said at the time. A Danish animal rights group took him to court over the exhibit. Evaristti was acquitted. Group claims captured troops were killed Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Guantanamo judge dismisses terror case Group denies link to NYC terror plot Most Viewed: Top Stories Insurgent video shows IDs of missing soldiers JFK airport plot suspects appear in Trinidad court Iraq Qaeda group says killed captured U.S. troops Taylor boycotts war crimes trial Judge&#39;s ruling may halt all Guantanamo trials Plane Crashes Into California Homes ABC News minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq ABC News minutes ago Andrew Speaker&#39;s Parents and In-Laws ABC News - AM ET When Good Baseball Managers Go Bad ABC News minutes ago Chilean born artist Marco Evaristti painted an iceberg red to produce a sculpture titled, &#39;The... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Elsewhere on the Web Initial tests negative for lawyer with TB Poll: Bush Base Erodes on Immigration Debate Personal histories shape immigration views People of the Web A violent video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. . All rights reserved. The information contained in the AFP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of Agence France Presse.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostemailed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_en_ot/tv_sopranos_recap As `Sopranos' end nears, so does Tony's - Yahoo! News As `Sopranos' end nears, so does Tony's By FRAZIER MOORE, AP Television Writer AM ET NEW YORK - The next-to-last episode of "The Sopranos" found one member of Tony's crew meeting a bloody end, another in critical condition and even Tony getting terminated by his therapist. For the moment, Tony is still alive. But life has been falling apart for him all season, on many fronts, at an escalating rate. Losses he has suffered range from business income (as his crew's earnings plunge) to self-esteem (his depression has returned with a vengeance). He's been forced to watch as his aimless son, A.J., was hospitalized for depression, and as daughter Meadow ditched her plans to study medicine. He also lost his nephew Christopher, who he once imagined would take over the crew. (Tony took an active role in this development: Fed up with Christopher's disloyalty, he killed him a few episodes ago.) In sum, Tony has lost the one thing no mob boss (or ordinary family man) can afford to be without: control. Tony is flailing, as Sunday's episode demonstrated disturbingly. (Spoiler alert: If you plan to watch the episode later and don't want a casualty report, stop reading now.) With hostilities boiling between New Jersey capo Tony Soprano and the New York mob, Brooklyn boss Phil Leotardo ordered hits on Tony, consigliere Silvio Dante and top soldier Bobby Bacala (who is Tony's brother-in-law). After getting tipped to the execution order by an agent, Tony declared, "We gotta hit first." Tony summoned two gunmen from Italy to take out Leotardo. But they shot the wrong gray-haired guy, an innocent victim. Meanwhile, the very much alive Leotardo (Frank Vincent) disappeared as his own people struck back. Bobby (Steven R. Schirripa) was shot down in a hobby shop, where the model-train buff was about to buy a new train for his layout. ) was critically wounded in the parking lot of the Bada Bing! strip club. Later, word came down that he wasn't expected to regain consciousness. (Patsy Parisi, at the wheel of the car in which Sil was a passenger, was apparently uninjured by the shooters and fled on foot.) Earlier in the hour, Tony's psychiatrist, Dr. Melfi, kicked out her longtime client after conceding, with dismay, that a recent study was right: Sociopaths don't improve from therapy, but use it to sharpen their antisocial skills by manipulating the therapist. "We're making progress," huffed Tony when Melfi ( ) grimly announced she wouldn't be treating him anymore. "It's been seven years!" The episode ended with Tony sending his wife, Carmela, as well as Meadow and A.J., into hiding. "It's just a precaution," Tony insisted. Separated from them, he was last seen in a tiny bedroom of a strange house in the dead of night, cradling a huge weapon, with Paulie and others of his dwindling crew downstairs, on guard. Back at the Bada Bing!, the Doors song "When the Music's Over" had been playing. And even if the viewer didn't know that next week is this HBO series' final episode, the truth was obvious: For Tony and "The Sopranos," time is running out. Full Coverage: Television Programming NBC Names Program Executive to Head TV Studio at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 "Battlestar\" gets grounded by Sci Fi Reuters via Yahoo! News, Jun 01 Dutch show has kidney donation contest AP via Yahoo! News, May 29 Gripping 'Lost' season-ender offers hope AP via Yahoo! News, May 24 The politics of the man behind 24. at The New Yorker, Feb 19 Hey! TV writers, are you listening? at Christian Science Monitor, Feb 09 NBC, Always Thinking of Us. But Do We Ever Call? at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), May 14 In Super Bowl Ratings Bonanza, Ads Are Minuses at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), Feb 06 Seacrest a laughmaker in `Knocked Up' NBC's Silverman to keep name on ABC show Hilton completes first night in LA jail Appeals court hands broadcasters a win Spoleto festival to honor Menotti Hilton completes first night in LA jail NBC's Silverman to keep name on ABC show Seacrest a laughmaker in `Knocked Up' LEAKING FAUCETS ARE TORTURE FOR WIFE MARRIED TO BIG DRIP Appeals court hands broadcasters a win Web Extra: Paris Hilton Statue Gets Jail Suit WCCO Minneapolis - 45 minutes ago A Very Simple Life: Paris Hilton Checks Into Jail CBS 2 / KCAL 9 Los Angeles - 1 hour, 47 minutes ago Check out highlights from the MTV Movie Awards AP minutes ago Paris Hilton gets no respect from fellow celebs AP minutes ago Order a Free Vacation Planning DVD. See All the Magic of Disney Parks. Mountain Dew Transform Your Summer Transformers Movie Sweepstakes. Protect. Destroy. July 4, 2007. The Police 28 Classic Tracks - 2Cd Set The Police's 30th anniversary 2CD set features 28 classic tracks. Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Television News - AP &raquo; More News Feeds Get on the Web Living in a porn-driven, &#39;look-at-me&#39; culture Send Joel Siegel Your Movie Reviews and Watch to See If You Make the Cut! Oh, what a night for the first live MTV set Whitney Matheson blogs on showbiz. &raquo; Entertainment on USAToday PEOPLE OF THE WEB One-time child star Kirk Cameron goes online to save souls. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/usatoday/20070601/cm_usatoday/satprepcoursessaveyourmoney SAT prep courses? Save your money - Yahoo! News People of the Web SAT prep courses? Save your money Fri Jun 1, 6:49 AM ET School&#39;s out. For kids, this typically means three months of freedom. But for many high school students, they will be enrolled in SAT test preparation classes with painful names such as "SAT Boot Camp" and "Intensive SAT," meeting five days a week. I used to be an SAT instructor at one of these test-prep schools. A commonly held belief was that these students had an unfair advantage over students who could not afford such courses. Our students and their parents, in turn, were brainwashed into believing that such courses were necessary. Well, I&#39;m here to let you in on a secret: Commercial SAT preparation is not what it&#39;s cracked up to be. Sure, at $1,000 a course, you&#39;d think there was some kind of magic being performed. Trust me, there isn&#39;t. My school used methods taught in books such as Princeton Review&#39;s The Official SAT Study Guide . The latter is so well-written, we often just read straight out of it in class. Here&#39;s another stereotype crumpled: Most of my students were Asian-Americans and, no, they didn&#39;t fit the worker-bee image. The majority ignored homework assignments, and some slept through class. I&#39;ve come to believe that a motivated student - even one without the money for prep classes - could easily outdo them on the SATs. Here are some hints how: Sign up on Number2.com, a site created by two Harvard University graduate students and a physics professor. It offers free, comprehensive prep courses online for the SAT, ACT and GRE. CollegeBoard.com, which administers the SAT, offers free practice questions, tips, a full-length SAT test and, for a $69.95 fee, an online course. If students want human contact, ePrep.com offers free videos with test-taking tips, featuring a veteran SAT tutor who is a Princeton University graduate. TutorVista.com outsources test prep to India, giving students 24-hours-a-day access to a tutor at a fraction of the cost of a course. In truth, the SAT is a rote test, so endless drilling by a computer might be the most effective method. And here&#39;s the final nail in the coffin: Derek Briggs, an assistant education professor at the University of Colorado at Boulder, wrote his dissertation on the effects of SAT coaching. He basically found that on average, "after controlling statistically for factors such as socioeconomic status and academic achievement," that SAT coached kids scored only just a little higher, one or two correct answers higher, than uncoached kids. Sometimes I think about my former SAT students and the Rube Goldberg situation they are in. I wish they could show some initiative. They&#39;d save their parents a lot of money. Jennifer Kim is a freelance writer. Entry to U.S. is all relative - and that?s the problem System has served us well A clean slate of world leaders The Christian Science Monitor Hey, journalists, enough with the fancy leads already! The Christian Science Monitor Most Viewed - Opinion Entry to U.S. is all relative - and that?s the problem A squirt or a surge? Both are miscast war metaphors Hey, journalists, enough with the fancy leads already! The Christian Science Monitor Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Illegal workers linger in Israel Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Poll: Opinions go against immigration measure Charges against Gitmo detainee dismissed Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Elsewhere on the Web Initial tests negative for lawyer with TB Poll: Bush Base Erodes on Immigration Debate The Christian Science Monitor Climate debate heats up G-8 ALSO IN Yahoo! NEWS The most popular world news and photos. &raquo; All Most Popular , a division of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070603/ap_on_bi_ge/cash_for_credit 'Piggybacking' roils credit industry - Yahoo! News 'Piggybacking' roils credit industry By J.W. ELPHINSTONE, AP Business Writer Sun Jun 3, 6:57 PM ET Only a low credit score stood between Alipio Estruch and a mortgage to buy a $449,000 Spanish-style house in Weston, Fla., a few miles west of Fort Lauderdale. Instead of spending several years repairing his credit rating, which he said was marred by two forgotten cell phone bills and identity theft, the 37-year-old real estate agent paid $1,800 to an Internet-based company to bump up his score almost overnight. The result was a happy ending for Estruch, but the growing practice is sending shivers through the mortgage industry. Federal regulators are also reviewing the practice. And after being contacted by The Associated Press for this story, Fair Isaac Corp., the developer of the widely used FICO score, said it will change its credit scoring system beginning later this year in a way it contends will end this little-known but potentially high-impact mortgage loan loophole. Instantcreditbuilders.com, or ICB, helped Estruch boost his score by arranging for him to be added as an authorized user on several credit cards of people with stellar credit who were paid to allow this coattailing. Parents also use this practice when they add their children to their credit cards to help them build solid credit. The pitch to those who are essentially renting their credit history for pay is seductive: You don't need to worry about users of this service receiving duplicate copies of your credit cards, account numbers or any of your personal information. It's essentially free money, they are told. Brian Kinney, 44, a retired Army officer in Glendale, Calif., pulls in more than $2,500 a month by lending out 19 credit card spots on two old Citibank cards with strong payment histories. Kinney, whose FICO score is above 800 on the scale of 300 to 850, quit his job working at a Farmers Insurance agency and uses the ICB income to tide him over until he starts his own insurance agency. Lenders are worried, however, that they're taking on greater default risks by unknowingly offering lower interest rates than they otherwise would to applicants who artificially boost their credit scores. Their trade group has complained to the Federal Trade Commission and is talking with the credit reporting bureaus in case the practice becomes more widespread. Estruch paid $1,800 in December for three credit card spots, and by January, his FICO score jumped from 550 to 715. In mid-March, he closed on his four-bedroom beige stucco house after obtaining a 30-year fixed-rate mortgage from a unit of American Home Mortgage Investment Corp. It carried a 7.5 percent interest rate and required no down payment. "Everything now is score driven. I had a great mortgage history, but I got hurt because of my credit score," said Estruch, who also works as a mortgage broker, had bought and sold two houses previously, and currently owns another home in New York. Estruch said he's current on his mortgage payments. Companies like Largo, Fla.-based ICB are sprouting on the Internet with little overhead and no-frills marketing. They post ads on community Web sites like Craigslist and have sponsored links on Google and Yahoo. Competitors of ICB have even reached out to mortgage brokers, lenders and real estate agents, flooding their e-mail with advertisements. Jason LaBossiere, who founded ICB a year and a half ago, said his company receives 100 to 150 new leads daily &#151; a number that has been growing &#151; and those inquiries lead to 10 to 20 new clients a week. ICB charges $900 for the first credit card account, with a discount for additional ones. The cardholder allowing the piggybacking on his or her credit history can receive $100 to $150 per slot, depending on the age and credit limit of each card. ICB pockets the rest. The effect on a credit score can vary depending on what else is in a client's report. But one borrowed credit card account can increase a score between 30 and 45 points, two between 60 and 90 points, and five between 150 and 205 points, according to ICB. That's because the computer program that calculates scores is essentially tricked into believing the credit renter has a better repayment history when it sees the added accounts, and that helps lift the credit score. Once the credit card company files an updated report to credit bureaus &#151; leading to a higher FICO score &#151; the credit renter is removed from the account of the person allowing the piggybacking. However, the credit card's payment history remains on the authorized user's credit report forever, and lenders have no way of knowing how the credit borrower is related to the cardholder. A higher credit score can save a consumer an enormous amount of money because it usually means a lower mortgage interest rate. It also can mean the difference between qualifying for a loan or not, as in Estruch's case. According to Fair Isaac, lenders would probably demand about a 9.8 percent interest rate on a $300,000, 30-year fixed mortgage for an applicant with a credit score between 500 and 579. That would translate into a $2,585 monthly payment for principal and interest. But a borrower with a score between 760 and 850 seeking the same loan would qualify for about a 6 percent rate that would cost just $1,796 a month for principal and interest. That savings of $789 each month would total $284,040 over 30 years. Kinney, the retired Army officer in California, said those borrowing his good credit history don't get his personal information, full credit card number or credit card expiration dates. Any sensitive data is handled through ICB, and Kinney adds the users himself by calling his credit card company. ICB also destroys any duplicate cards that are issued to the credit renter, according to its contract. Instead of being worried about risks he may be assuming, Kinney said borrowers are the ones vulnerable to scammers posing as do-gooders. Those seeking a credit hike give the cardholder their names and numbers, which, in the wrong hands, could lead to identity theft. Kinney said he also receives credit card offers in the mail for the credit borrowers on his accounts, opening up another possibility for fraud, but he throws them away. "I know the whole thing sounds kind of odd and not very legitimate, but it is for now," Kinney said. "I don't know how long before someone will decide it's illegal. But I'm not counting on this for the long-term." Ginny Ferguson, a mortgage broker in Pleasanton, Calif., and a credit expert for the National Association of Mortgage Brokers, considers the practice mortgage fraud, and the trade organization is about to release a policy statement against it. "These companies are encouraging consumers to commit fraud. On a standard home loan, there's a clause that says the consumer is not omitting pertinent facts that could impact his or her ability to repay the loan," Ferguson said. ICB's LaBossiere said he sees his business as a second chance for the consumer who has had little financial education to make good decisions. "People who are our clients are spending an incredible amount of money to get their finances back in order," he said. "They've learned through a school of pain that it's such an important aspect of regaining control of their lives again." So far, federal authorities have yet to make a ruling on the practice. "What I've gathered from attorneys here is that it appears to be legal" technically, said FTC spokesman Frank Dorman. "However, the agency is not saying that it is legal." Lenders, who depend on credit scores to assess a person's ability to pay back a loan, are closely watching the practice's growth. It also comes at a time when the industry is reeling from the a soaring default rate on subprime mortgages, home loans for people with bad credit. As a result, they've tightened lending standards, but the credit-renting practice threatens to undermine their efforts to reduce exposure to risky borrowers. Ninety percent of the largest U.S. banks base their loan decisions on FICO scores, which currently include authorized user accounts. However, after discussions with lenders and industry officials, Fair Isaac said it intends to announce this week that all future versions of its FICO score methodology will no longer consider authorized user accounts, said Tom Quinn, Fair Isaac's vice president of scoring solutions. The next version is slated to roll out in September to one of the three main credit reporting agencies &#151; Equifax Inc., Experian Information Solutions Inc. or TransUnion LLC &#151; with the other two agencies receiving the new version some time in 2008. The change won't be a quick-fix for lenders trying to weed out credit renters. Corey Carlisle, senior director of government affairs for the Mortgage Bankers Association, said it takes time for lenders to transition from one scoring system to another. "All lenders have their own guidelines and parameters on how to use and incorporate the FICO score. It would take time to understand what's in a new credit score," Carlisle said. Quinn also noted that some lenders generate their own scores using authorized user accounts in their calculations, so the practice may not be easily negated. "It's an industrywide issue and there are other scores out there," he said. This is a phenomenon that impacts more than just FICO scores." Other consumers besides credit renters stand to lose with the change, namely those for whom authorized user accounts were designed: college students on their parents' cards and spouses with little to no credit of their own. But there's no way to distinguish these from the latest crop of strangers trying to augment their scores. Lenders who want to find out more information about others on credit card accounts are hindered by the Fair Credit Reporting Act and privacy laws. "As with any decision, there's a trade-off," Quinn said. "The many honest consumers who learn good credit skills with the help from a family member, that feature will be removed. But the challenge for us is maintaining the integrity of the FICO score." Stocks eke out gain despite China drop Factory orders post weak advance Palm sells 25 percent stake Krispy Kreme widens 1Q losses Hyundai grabs lead in auto quality study Most Viewed - Business Ex-Enron executive sentenced to 2 years in prison Oil at $70 as cyclone nears Mideast Gulf Krispy Kreme widens 1Q losses Loews bets on natural gas in $4 billion Dominion deal Stocks eke out gain despite China drop Middle-class America in peril CNN - PM ET Life after work: Sharing a legacy CNN - Fri Jun 1, 8:06 PM ET Save Money on Airfare! ABC News - Fri Jun 1, 7:38 PM ET May: a Great Month for Jobs ABC News - Fri Jun 1, 6:03 PM ET Pay less each month. Make your future debt free. No upfront costs. First 3 Months at 1/2 price. Free Domain Name & Setup. 24/7 Support. Chase Home Equity Loan Low rates. No closing costs. No app fee. No annual fees. Apply online. Alipio Estruch is shown at his home in Weston, Fla., Thursday, May 31, 2007. Only... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get on the Web Spotlight on cancer: Drugs, new studies China Goes Decadent With &#39;Millionaire Fair&#39; Dow Jones owners seen on the defensive Investors get nervous in China, and Murdoch makes nice. &raquo; Read Today's Column Get advice on how to manage the outcome of your income. &raquo; More from Yahoo! Finance Get the latest news, features and photos. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/livescience/20070604/sc_livescience/newdepressionrxgetmarried New Depression Rx: Get Married - Yahoo! News New Depression Rx: Get Married AM ET People who are looking to ease depression may have a new treatment option--marriage. A recent study suggests that marriage provides a greater psychological boost to depressed people than to happy people, even if the marriage is so-so. Previous studies have suggested that the psychological perks of marriage depend upon marriage quality--a gives rise to a happy couple, and vice versa. Other studies have shown that depressed people, who tend to communicate poorly and require more caring and support than happy people, also end up in unhappier marriages. So Adrianne Frech, a sociology graduate student at Ohio State University, and her colleague, Kristi Williams, speculated that happy people would garner more psychological perks from marriage than depressed people. To test their theory, they looked at a sample of 3,066 who had been interviewed and tested for depression once in either 1987 or 1988 and then again five years later. In the interviews, they were asked about the quality of their marriage (if they were married). On average, controlling for differences in depression, subjects who had gotten married over the five-year span between the two interviews reported improved psychological well-being in the second interview--scoring an average of 3.42 points lower on the 84-point depression scale--than their counterparts who did not marry. When they teased apart how marriage affected those who had been depressed at the start of the study to those who had been happy, however, they came across something unexpected. The depressed who married scored an average of 7.56 points lower on the depression scale than the depressed who did not marry, while those who were and got married scored only 1.87 points lower on the scale. In other words, marriage provided a much bigger psychological boost to the depressed subjects than to the happy subjects. &ldquo;We were surprised,&rdquo; Frech told LiveScience. &ldquo;We expected the to have worse marital quality and therefore benefit less from a transition into marriage.&rdquo; The findings, to be published in the Journal of Health and Social Behavior, hold true even though depressed people do have unhappier marriages. &ldquo;The depressed benefit more from a transition into marriage despite their having, on average, worse marital quality,&rdquo; Frech noted. The big remaining question, she says, is why depressed people benefit more from marriage than happy people. It could be that marriage provides the companionship and emotional support needed to help alleviate depression, she said. The Sex Quiz: Myths, Taboos and Bizarre Facts The Keys to Happiness and Why We Don&#39;t Use Them 10 Easy Paths to Self-Destruction New Depression Rx: Get Married for more daily news, views and scientific inquiry with an original, provocative point of view. LiveScience reports amazing, real world breakthroughs, made simple and stimulating for people on the go. Check out our collection of Science, Animal and Dinosaur Pictures , and more. Get cool gadgets at the new , sign up for our free daily email newsletter and check out our Full Coverage: Mental Health New Depression Rx: Get Married LiveScience.com via Yahoo! News, Jun 04 Concussions Tied to Depression in Ex-N.F.L. Players at The New York Times (reg. req'd), May 31 Bipolar Spectrum Disorder Under-Recognized HealthDay via Yahoo! News, May 10 Cannabis 'disrupts brain centre' at BBC, Apr 30 The ten top ways to beat stress at The Independent (UK), Feb 20 Not Just Any Old Butterflies at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), Jan 13 Mental Health Reform, Please at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), Oct 29 Mental illness is hell. Don't diminish it at The London Times, Oct 15 Scientists find 24 species in Suriname Indonesian kangaroos to gain freedom Probe passing Venus on way to Mercury China won't adopt caps on gas emissions Israel Museum displays rare manuscript Most Viewed - Science Purple frog among 24 new species found in Suriname Man says he captured Loch Ness on film Scientists find 24 species in Suriname Sharks Use Strange Trick to Hunt Prey Blame coal: Texas leads carbon emissions Weather & Science Video AccuWeather - AM ET Live in Mississippi: The first to rebuild after Katrina weather.com - AM ET AccuWeather - AM ET weather.com - AM ET Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Elsewhere on the Web Divers dismantle artificial tire reef New insights into earliest trees uncovered Study: Climate change models overstate droughts SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Are cicadas crawling out of the ground at your house? Submit your photos to You Witness News. Track innovations in science, health and technology. Explore the world's wonders and the battle to save them. The most popular science news stories and photos. &raquo; All Most Popular
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostemailed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_he_me/roller_shoe_injuries Doctors say roller shoes injuring kids - Yahoo! News Doctors say roller shoes injuring kids By LINDSEY TANNER, AP Medical Writer AM ET CHICAGO - Trendy wheeled sneakers that let kids zip down sidewalks, across playgrounds and through mall crowds could also send them rolling into emergency rooms on a stretcher, say doctors who blame a rash of injuries on the international craze. It's called "heeling," named after Heelys, the most popular brand. They're sold in 70 countries and are so hot that their Carrollton, Texas, maker, Heelys Inc., recently landed atop BusinessWeek's annual list of fastest growing companies. But doctors from Ireland to Singapore have reported treating broken wrists, arms and ankles; dislocated elbows and even cracked skulls in children injured while wearing roller shoes. Over a 10-week period last summer, 67 children were treated for injuries from Heelys or strap-on wheels called Street Gliders at Temple Street Children's University Hospital in Dublin, Ireland, according to a report in the June edition of Pediatrics. From September 2005 through December 2006, one death and at least 64 roller-shoe injuries were reported to the U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission Consumer Product Safety Commission , a spokesman said last week. And doctors in Singapore reported last year that 37 children had been treated for similar injuries at a hospital there during a seven-month period in 2004. None were wearing protective gear. The American Academy of Orthopaedic Surgeons, based in Rosemont, Ill., this week is issuing new safety advice that recommends helmets, wrist protectors and knee and elbow pads for kids who wear wheeled shoes. "As these shoes are sold in department stores, parents buying them may develop a false sense of security &#151; that they are like any other shoe," said Dr. James Beaty, academy president and a pediatric orthopedic surgeon in Memphis. Heelys and their knockoffs look like gym shoes, but with wheel sockets in each heel. They can be used for walking, but the wheels pop out when users shift their weight to their heels. Balancing on the wheels can be tricky, especially for novices. In the Irish study, most injuries were in new users and occurred when kids fell backward while trying to transfer their body weight. Dr. Leon Benson of Evanston Northwestern Healthcare in Evanston, Ill., recalled treating a 9-year-old girl who'd had her Heelys for just a week when she fell and broke both wrists. Nine-year-old Noah Woelfel of Davidsonville, Md., wasn't a novice but still tripped and fell, breaking several fingers and wrist bones in his right hand last year. "All it took was a tiny piece of gravel in the driveway that went up in the wheel and stopped him cold," said his mother, Nancy. "He required surgery and pins, and he was six weeks without using his hand, right at the beginning of school." She threw the removable wheels away and said other parents should know about the risks. Dr. Dominic Catanese, a foot specialist at Montefiore Medical Center in New York, said balancing on heels can strain feet and Achilles tendons. He has treated several Heelys-related ankle injuries and won't let his 7-year-old daughter have the shoes. "She wants them. Not happening. Just like I took away her trampoline" after reading about trampoline injuries. "It went right to Goodwill," Catanese said. Heelys in April said a study it commissioned shows that their shoes have a safer injury rate than skateboarding, inline skating and even swimming. The shoes are sold with safety information including a recommendation to wear protective gear. The company says it has shipped more than 10 million pairs since their introduction in 2000. Heelys reported first-quarter income of $8.5 million, five times higher than last year. Still, some walkers find heelers who zip in and out of crowds a nuisance, and many schools and shopping malls have banned them. Kelly Ford, 14, used to cruise down the halls of her Chicago grammar school in Heelys &#151; a practice that led teachers to confiscate some kids' wheels. Now a high school freshman, Ford has outgrown her Heelys. She said kids who wear them won't pay much attention to safety warnings. "I don't think any kid is going to want to wear a helmet to school," Ford said. She thinks Heelys are being unfairly targeted. "It's just like, let your kid have fun. I think they're fine," Ford said. American Academy of Pediatrics: Chemo and surgery may help colon cancer Study: Liver cancer breakthrough found EU launches campaign to tackle back pain China rejects U.S. warning on toothpaste TB quarantines common at local level Most Viewed - Health Study: Liver cancer breakthrough found Abused drug used to treat heart failure TB patient&#39;s family defend controversial travel Researchers find 2,100 year-old melon MRI better at spotting precancerous growths CNN - PM ET Germs in the workplace CNN - Sat Jun 2, 3:33 PM ET Friends stand by TB patient CNN - Sat Jun 2, 9:05 AM ET Fighting Cancer on a Video Game ABC News - Fri Jun 1, 10:04 PM ET Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get Product Safety Commission Elsewhere on the Web Initial tests negative for lawyer with TB Liver cancer patients get hope from kidney cancer drug Heelys Hazardous for Kids, Study Finds Find answers on Yahoo! Health: &raquo; More from Y! Health People of the Web A grandfather- grandson team soothes souls with online hugs. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostemailed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_eu/russia_us_missiles Russia warns U.S. about missile system - Yahoo! News Russia warns U.S. about missile system By MARIA DANILOVA, Associated Press Writer PM ET warned that Moscow could take "retaliatory steps" if Washington proceeds with plans to build a missile defense system for Europe, including possibly aiming nuclear weapons at targets on the continent. Speaking to foreign reporters days before he heads to Germany for the annual summit with and the other Group of Eight leaders, Putin assailed the White House plan to place a radar system in the Czech Republic and interceptor missiles in neighboring Poland. Washington says the system is needed to counter a potential threat from In an interview released Monday, Putin suggested that Russia may respond to the threat by aiming its nuclear weapons at Europe. "If a part of the strategic nuclear potential of the United States appears in Europe and, in the opinion of our military specialists, will threaten us, then we will have to take appropriate steps in response. What kind of steps? We will have to have new targets in Europe," Putin said, according to a transcript released by the Kremlin. These could be targeted with "ballistic or cruise missiles or maybe a completely new system" he said. , asked aboard Air Force One about Putin's comments on the missile shield, said there has bee "some escalation in the rhetoric." "We think that that is not helpful. We would like to have a constructive dialogue with Russia on this issue. We have had it in the past," Hadley said. Putin also defended his leadership credentials at a time when Russia is accused by the West of backsliding on democracy, taking greater state control of industry and news media, and repressing political opposition. "I am an absolute and pure democrat," Putin said. "There simply aren't others like this in the world." On Monday, Iran's top security official called the U.S. plans for the missile defense shield a "joke," saying Iranian missiles do not have the capability to reach Europe. "Claims by U.S. officials that installing a missile defense system in Europe is aimed at confronting Iranian missiles and protecting Europe against Iran is the joke of the year," Ali Larijani told the state-run IRNA news agency. "The range of Iran's missiles doesn't reach Europe at all," IRNA quoted Larijani as saying in Iran's first public reaction to the plans. Larijani is secretary of Iran's Supreme National Security Council, the country's top security decision-making body. Iran is known to possess a medium-range ballistic missile called the Shahab-3 that has a range of at least 800 miles, capable of striking . In 2005, Iranian officials said they had improved the range of the Shahab-3 to 1,200 miles. Although Western experts believe Iran is developing the Shahab-4 missile &#151; thought to have a range between 1,200 and 1,900 miles, which would enable it to hit much of Europe &#151; Iran has not confirmed such reports. Iran initially acknowledged in 1999 it was developing the Shahab-4, but claimed it would be used only as a space launch vehicle for commercial satellites. Putin told reporters that he hoped U.S. officials would change their minds regarding the missile plan, warning that Moscow was preparing a response. "The strategic balance in the world is being upset and in order to restore this balance without creating an anti-missile defense on our territory we will be creating a system of countering that anti-missile system, which is what we are doing now," Putin said. A spokesman for British Prime Minister said Russia's warning that it could aim its missiles at Europe is worrying, but the bloc will not hesitate in expressing its displeasure. "Europe as a whole ... does have concerns about Russian behavior and will not be shy about expressing those concerns," he said on condition of anonymity, in line with government policy. "What we want is a constructive relationship, but what the nature of that relationship is as much up to Russia as it is to us." Relations between Moscow and Washington have soured in the past year. The two former Cold War foes are at odds over Washington's missile plans, over Russia's conflicts with former Soviet nations &#151; including Ukraine, Georgia and Estonia &#151; and over U.S. concerns of democratic backsliding in Russia. The White House has made no comment on Putin's new warning. Putin gave a stinging critique of the U.S. and European powers. "We look at what has been created in North America &#151; horror, torture, homelessness, Guantanamo, detention without courts or investigation," Putin said. Putin, who is nine months from the end of his second and final four-year term in office, also said Russia's presidents should serve longer terms. Immensely popular with voters &#151; he was re-elected in 1994 with more than 71 percent of the vote &#151; Putin has consistently rejected changing the law to allow him a third consecutive term. But his comments to reporters from G-8 nations seemed certain to feed speculation that he would seek to stay in power beyond the spring of 2008. "Four years is a fairly short time," Putin said according to the transcript. "It seems to me that in today's Russia five, six or seven years would be acceptable, but the number of terms still should be limited." Associated Press Writer Ali Akbar Dareini in Tehran, Iran contributed to this report. Landslide damages famed valley in Russia AP, 1 hour, 10 minutes ago Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit AP, 1 hour, 25 minutes ago Backdrop to G-8 summit: Russia-West tensions at Christian Science Monitor, Jun 04 New era of discord for Russia and West at BBC, Jun 04 France urges talks to allay Russian concerns on U.S. shield at RIA Novosti, Jun 04 Bush shelters from Putin's rhetoric at Financial Times, Jun 04 Kick the Russians out at Daily Telegraph (UK), Jun 04 at The Economist, Apr 26 Group claims captured troops were killed Guantanamo judge dismisses terror case Group denies link to NYC terror plot Tiananmen Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Most Viewed - World Group claims captured troops were killed Would-be suicide bomber dies in Somalia Guantanamo judge dismisses terror case Group denies link to NYC terror plot Pakistan&#39;s Musharraf tightens media regulations Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 40 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Russian President Vladimir Putin presides a Security Council meeting in the Moscow Kremlin, Saturday, June... Russian President Vladimir Putin Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note G-8 protesters, police clash in Germany Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Europe News - AP &raquo; More News Feeds Get on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/nh_quakes Three mild earthquakes shake NH coast - Yahoo! News Three mild earthquakes shake NH coast AM ET EXETER, N.H. - After people called 911 to report hearing explosions, emergency officials initially thought there had been underground methane gas blasts. But it turns out that New Hampshire actually had three small earthquakes over the weekend. The tremors caused no damage or injuries. The state Emergency Management Agency said the quakes were felt Saturday night and Sunday afternoon in the Portsmouth-Exeter area. listed two of the quakes as magnitudes 1.4 and 1.9. A magnitude for the third quake was not available. Initially, officials investigated whether the sounds and tremors were caused by underground methane gas explosions, and the naturally occurring gas was found escaping from the ground in Portsmouth on Saturday. However, authorities were able to rule that out as the cause, Assistant Fire Chief Steven Achilles said. He said the methane gas discovery was either a coincidence or a result of the tremors. New Hampshire experiences an average of three to four earthquakes per year, most of them so minor they aren't even felt, said Jim Van Dongen, spokesman for the state Office of Emergency Management. Full Coverage: Earthquakes and Volcanoes Three mild earthquakes shake NH coast AP, AM ET Thousands displaced by China quake AP, AM ET A very British response as earthquake strikes Kent at The Independent (UK), May 01 'We heard a massive rumble' at BBC, Apr 28 Earthquake damage closes school at BBC, Apr 30 Quake will cost insurers millions at BBC, Apr 30 Disaster requires unity, not dissent at The Age, Apr 04 Mt Mayon enters its 'most dangerous' phase at Korea Herald, Aug 14 Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Women prosecuted for smuggling children Dallas could elect its first gay mayor Court backs Mo. death penalty procedure Most Viewed - U.S. Vt. secession movement gains traction Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Paris Hilton begins jail term a day early Public denied access to Calif. beaches Raw video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes ABC News minutes ago Metal Man Puts Mind Over Matter ABC News minutes ago Jury indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_he_me/liver_cancer Study: Liver cancer breakthrough found - Yahoo! News Study: Liver cancer breakthrough found By LINDSEY TANNER, AP Medical Writer CHICAGO - For the first time, doctors said Monday they have found a pill that improves survival for people with liver cancer, a notoriously hard to treat disease diagnosed in more than half a million people globally each year. The results in a multinational study of 602 patients with advanced liver cancer are impressive and likely will change the way patients are treated, say cancer specialists, including the study authors. Patients got either two tablets daily of a drug called sorafenib or dummy pills in the study, which started in March 2005. Some patients are still alive, although on average, sorafenib patients survived 10.7 months versus almost 8 months for those on dummy pills. That type of survival advantage "has never happened" with liver cancer "and is a major breakthrough in the management of the disease," said Dr. Josep Llovet, the lead author. "That may not sound like a lot of time," but for liver cancer, "this is actually a quite impressive gain," said Dr. Nancy Davidson of Johns Hopkins' Bloomberg School of Public Health. "It is the first effective systemic treatment for liver cancer, which is such a huge problem internationally." The results were released Monday at the American Society of Clinical Oncology's annual meeting. "We now have moved forward" in treating advanced liver cancer "when it was not really possible before," Dr. William Blackstock of Wake Forest University School of Medicine said at a press briefing about the study. Sorafenib attacks cancer with a targeted double-barreled approach. It zeros in on malignant cells themselves and cuts off the blood supply feeding the tumor. It is believed to work on tumors within the liver and those that have spread elsewhere. In the study, tumors didn't shrink or disappear but in many cases they also didn't grow. "You are not curing the disease but you are delaying the progression of the disease significantly and strikingly," said Llovet, of Mount Sinai School of Medicine in New York and Hospital Clinic of Barcelona, Spain. The study was halted early in February because of the good results, and patients on dummy pills were switched to sorafenib. "This is a very good step forward in this disease," said Dr. Emily Chan of Vanderbilt-Ingram Cancer Center in Nashville, Tenn. The drug, sold under the brand name Nexavar, is approved in the United States and dozens of other countries to treat advanced kidney cancer. It is marketed by Bayer Pharmaceuticals Corp. and Onyx Pharmaceuticals Inc., which funded the liver cancer study. They hope to receive approval for liver cancer use from U.S. and foreign regulators. Llovet has done consulting for the sponsors. Liver cancer is diagnosed in about 19,000 Americans annually but is much more common elsewhere and is the fifth most common cancer globally. Risk factors include chronic liver infections and some forms of hepatitis. The disease is common in China and countries without widespread use of the hepatitis B vaccine, which is routinely given to U.S. infants. Liver cancer doesn't respond well to conventional chemotherapy and is often diagnosed too late for surgery to be an option. Many patients die within a year of diagnosis. Robert Throckmorton, a 73-year-old attorney in Orange County, Calif., said his doctor told him "You better get your affairs in order" after he was diagnosed with inoperable liver cancer last August. But then the doctor offered sorafenib off-label, and Throckmorton readily agreed. He did not take part in the study. After nine months on the drug, Throckmorton said his cancer shows no sign of progression and he has no significant side effects. He said he walks three miles six days a week to stay active and feels fine. Instead of thinking about wills and funerals, Throckmorton is looking forward to get-togethers with his eight children and 18 grandchildren, and even a possible church trip to Uruguay with his wife. "I have good energy," Throckmorton said. "We are optimistic." American Society of Clinical Oncology: Chemo and surgery may help colon cancer EU launches campaign to tackle back pain China rejects U.S. warning on toothpaste TB quarantines common at local level Entertaining TV programs make you eat, study finds Most Viewed - Health Abused drug used to treat heart failure Doctors say roller shoes injuring kids TB patient&#39;s family defend controversial travel Researchers find 2,100 year-old melon MRI better at spotting precancerous growths CNN - PM ET Germs in the workplace CNN - Sat Jun 2, 3:33 PM ET Friends stand by TB patient CNN - Sat Jun 2, 9:05 AM ET Fighting Cancer on a Video Game ABC News - Fri Jun 1, 10:04 PM ET Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. The logo of Bayer at the company&#39;s plant in Wuppertal-Elberfield, Germany. A drug approved for... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get on the Web Initial tests negative for lawyer with TB Liver cancer patients get hope from kidney cancer drug Heelys Hazardous for Kids, Study Finds Find answers on Yahoo! Health: &raquo; More from Y! Health People of the Web A grandfather- grandson team soothes souls with online hugs. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostemailed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_go_ca_st_pe/crime Robberies surge on violent crime survey - Yahoo! News Robberies surge on violent crime survey By LARA JAKES JORDAN, Associated Press Writer PM ET WASHINGTON - The nation's murder rate rose slightly last year but the number of robberies skyrocketed by 6 percent, preliminary data released Monday show. The statistics were part of an overall 1.3 percent rise in violent crime across the country in 2006 &#151; the second straight annual increase. However, car thefts, arsons and other property crimes dipped for the second straight year, the data show. The modest increase in murders reflected a mixed bag for cities. The number of homicides in major metropolitan areas &#151; those with at least 1 million residents &#151; climbed by 6.7 percent. Smaller cities, meanwhile, saw their murders decrease by a collective 11.9 percent. The spike in robberies marked the highest increase in any category of crime surveyed in the FBI report, which was compiled with data from more than 11,700 law enforcement agencies nationwide. Violent crime rose in every region of the country except for the Northeast, the FBI reported. Western states saw the largest jump in violent crime, by 2.8 percent, the data show. The new numbers come amid a Justice Department push to tamp down violent crime with millions of new dollars in funds to local police and a surge of federal agents to troubled cities. Attorney General Alberto Gonzales &#151; who took office as violent crime started to rise &#151; has called the crackdown one of his top priorities for the remaining 18 months of his tenure at the Justice Department. In a spot of good news, violent crime grew at a slower pace than initially expected. In December, the FBI projected a 3.7 percent increase for the first six months of 2006. The year before, in 2005, violent crime rose by 2.3 percent. Property crimes decreased overall by 2.9 percent from 2005, the FBI reported. Burglaries, however, rose slightly &#151; particularly in mid-sized cities, where the rate grew by 3.3 percent. The FBI's 2006 preliminary Uniform Crime Report can be found at: Full Coverage: Law Enforcement Robberies surge on violent crime survey AP via Yahoo! News, Jun 04 Segways give N.Y. police a PR boost Reuters via Yahoo! News, Jun 01 Los Angeles Police Chief Notes Failures of Command at Rally at The New York Times (reg. req'd), May 30 Atlanta overhauls police narcotics unit AP via Yahoo! News, May 23 Once again, L.A. pledges to end police brutality Reuters via Yahoo! News, May 08 Arrests generate publicity, criticism at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Mar 09 Don't approve Bratton yet at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), May 08 The LAPD 15 years later at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Apr 29 Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Analysis: The 2008 authenticity race Guantanamo judge dismisses terror case McCain, Romney clash over immigration Most Viewed - Politics Feds say La. congressman to be indicted Democratic congressman indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note McCain, Romney clash over immigration U.S. cuts back climate checks from space ABC News - 40 minutes ago Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq ABC News minutes ago Cold War Rhetoric: Building Missile Defenses ABC News minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Violent crime rose for the second year running in 2006 across the United States, in... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) White House News - AP &raquo; More News Feeds Get on the Web Family ties at issue as Senate returns to immigration The Note: Meet The New John Edwards Poll: Opinions go against immigration measure SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. &raquo; More from Congressional Quarterly People of the Web A gay blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_en_tv/paris_hilton Hilton completes first night in LA jail - Yahoo! News Hilton completes first night in LA jail By AMANDA BECK, Associated Press Writer 1 hour, 14 minutes ago completed the first night of her probation sentence as morning arrived Monday in her new surroundings &#151; a Los Angeles County jail cell that will be her home for much of this month. The 26-year-old hotel heiress worked the red carpet at the MTV Movie Awards on Sunday afternoon, then traded her strapless designer gown for a jail-issue jumpsuit and a solitary cell. Hilton entered the Century Regional Detention Facility in Lynwood just after 11:30 p.m. to serve 23 days for violating her probation in an alcohol-related reckless driving case. She is due out on June 26. "It's hell. Go to jail and you'll find out," Alicia Singleton, 23, of Oakland, said Monday as she left jail after serving five weeks for a crime she refused to describe. Singleton said she and other inmates were asleep when Hilton checked in. Around 7 a.m., they learned Hilton was there when they watched the TV news. To most of them, it was no big deal. "Oh, Paris, Paris, Paris. If you do the crime you've got to do the time," Singleton said. Hilton surrendered after a surprise visit to the MTV awards. "I am trying to be strong right now," she told reporters on the red carpet. "I'm ready to face my sentence. Even though this is a really hard time, I have my family, my friends and my fans to support me, and that's really helpful." Sheriff's spokesman Steve Whitmore said Hilton was easy to work with. "Her demeanor was helpful. She was focused, she was cooperative," he said. Hilton, accompanied by her mother, Kathy Hilton, surrendered at the Men's Central Jail in downtown Los Angeles just after 10:30 p.m. She was then escorted to the women's facility in Lynwood, where she was booked, fingerprinted, photographed, medically screened and issued an orange top and pants, Whitmore said. Hilton's booking photo shows her wearing what appeared to be a V-neck shirt, eye makeup and lip gloss that highlighted a slight smile. Her blond hair was draped over one shoulder. Sheriff's deputies had released a mug shot taken last year after Hilton was arrested by Los Angeles police. That photo showed her smiling, in full makeup and with her head tilted to the left, with her blond hair flowing over her bare shoulders. The mistake was made because the sheriff's department and LAPD mug shots are in the same database, Whitmore said. "It was an inadvertent release." Hilton, star of the TV reality series "The Simple Life," is being housed in the "special needs" unit of the 13-year-old jail, separate from most of its 2,200 inmates. The unit contains 12 two-person cells reserved for police officers, public officials, celebrities and other high-profile inmates. Hilton's cell has two bunks, a table, a sink, a toilet and a small window. She does not have a cellmate. Like other inmates in that unit, Hilton will take her meals in her cell and will be allowed outside the 12-by-8-foot space for at least an hour each day to shower, watch TV in the day room, participate in outdoor recreation or talk on the telephone. No cell phones or BlackBerrys are permitted in the facility, even for visitors. It will be pretty stark for her, but it will be a step up from the general population. Teresa Jones, 50, of Lancaster, who wasn't clear about what she served time for, called the jail "so filthy it's worse than skid row." At check-in, jailers hand out a pamphlet on infections, which are common, she said. "That place is hell, it's awful. Life is easy compared to this," Jones said. The jail, a two-story concrete building next to train tracks and beneath a bustling freeway, has been an all-female facility since March 2006. It's located in an industrial area about 12 miles southeast of downtown Los Angeles. When Hilton was sentenced May 4, the judge ruled that she would not be allowed any work release, furloughs or use of an alternative jail or electronic monitoring in lieu of jail. Hilton's publicist, Elliot Mintz, said he spoke with Kathy Hilton after she returned from the jail. "She told me it was very emotional," Mintz said. "She also said that she feels this will be a time when Paris will be able to think and reflect and to spend time alone to learn from the experience because in Paris' life she's never alone &#151; there's always a constant chatter around her." Officers arrested Hilton in Hollywood on Sept. 7. In January, she pleaded no contest to the reckless-driving charge and was sentenced to 36 months' probation, alcohol education and $1,500 in fines. She was pulled over by California Highway Patrol on Jan. 15. Officers informed Hilton she was driving on a suspended license and she signed a document acknowledging she was not to drive. She then was pulled over by sheriff's deputies on Feb. 27, at which time she was charged with violating her probation. Full Coverage: Celebrity Crime Paris Hilton starts jail sentence at BBC, Jun 04 DA: Tom Sizemore should go to prison AP via Yahoo! News, May 25 Evidence hidden in Spector trial at BBC, May 24 Actor Garrison pleads guilty in drink driving death Reuters via Yahoo! News, May 21 Unfazed by his judgment of Paris at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), May 08 Spector trial renews debate on TV in courtroom at San Francisco Chronicle, Apr 25 Commentary: Media circus at the Spector trial at Daily Telegraph (UK), May 01 Go (away) O.J., go at San Francisco Chronicle, Nov 21 Seacrest a laughmaker in `Knocked Up' NBC's Silverman to keep name on ABC show Hilton completes first night in LA jail Appeals court hands broadcasters a win Spoleto festival to honor Menotti NBC's Silverman to keep name on ABC show As `Sopranos' end nears, so does Tony's Seacrest a laughmaker in `Knocked Up' LEAKING FAUCETS ARE TORTURE FOR WIFE MARRIED TO BIG DRIP Appeals court hands broadcasters a win Web Extra: Paris Hilton Statue Gets Jail Suit WCCO Minneapolis - 46 minutes ago A Very Simple Life: Paris Hilton Checks Into Jail CBS 2 / KCAL 9 Los Angeles - 1 hour, 48 minutes ago Check out highlights from the MTV Movie Awards AP minutes ago Paris Hilton gets no respect from fellow celebs AP minutes ago Mountain Dew Transform Your Summer Transformers Movie Sweepstakes. Protect. Destroy. July 4, 2007. The Police 28 Classic Tracks - 2Cd Set The Police's 30th anniversary 2CD set features 28 classic tracks. Buy a Universal Orlando Vacation, Get 7 days of Unlimited Admission. This video image released Monday June 4, 2007 by TMZ.Com shows hotel heiress Paris Hilton,... Paris Already Unpopular With Prison Inmates Prison staff says the celebutante will not get special treatment. Eileen Gonzales reports. &raquo; More CBS 2 / KCAL 9 Los Angeles video Paris Hilton reports to LA county jail Paris Hilton checked into a Los Angeles County jail late Sunday to begin a three-week stay for violating her probation in an alcohol-related reckless driving case. (June 4) &raquo; More AP video &raquo; Show all news video Get on the Web Living in a porn-driven, &#39;look-at-me&#39; culture Send Joel Siegel Your Movie Reviews and Watch to See If You Make the Cut! Oh, what a night for the first live MTV set Whitney Matheson blogs on showbiz. &raquo; Entertainment on USAToday PEOPLE OF THE WEB One-time child star Kirk Cameron goes online to save souls. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_he_me/healthbeat_heart_failure Abused drug used to treat heart failure - Yahoo! News Abused drug used to treat heart failure By LAURAN NEERGAARD, AP Medical Writer 2 hours, 37 minutes ago WASHINGTON - U.S. doctors are beginning a dramatic experiment this month to try to save patients dying from congestive heart failure &#151; by temporarily resting their hearts and then boosting them with a drug long abused for bodybuilding. The goal: To help the heart heal itself, and rescue patients who otherwise wouldn't survive without a heart transplant or an implanted machine to pump their hearts. "The provocative question is, once you get to that level, is it too late or are there people still recoverable even at that point?" asks Dr. Clyde Yancy of the , who is closely monitoring the experiment. The study is very small, and there's no way to predict if it will work. But British scientists reported a tantalizing hint last fall that the combination of a temporarily implanted heart pump and an asthma drug not approved for sale in this country &#151; the athlete-abused clenbuterol &#151; just might offer hope of recovery for this common, intractable killer. "We think this is a completely novel way to look at the treatment of heart failure," says Dr. Leslie Miller of Washington Hospital Center in the nation's capital, one of seven U.S. study sites. Almost 5 million Americans, and 20 million people worldwide, have congestive heart failure. Their hearts are weakened by age, damage from a survived heart attack, or other problems. It can strike seemingly healthy young people, too, for no discernible reason. Some drugs and pacemakers treat heart failure very well. But often the disease worsens over years, the heart getting weaker until patients find it difficult even to walk across a room. Fluid seeps into their lungs and blocks breathing. They have few options: A transplant &#151; and there are only about 2,200 U.S. donors a year, while 58,000 Americans die of heart failure annually &#151; or an implanted heart pump. These devices give the heart a rest, taking over the pumping action that's normally the job of the left ventricle. But the implants only last a few years. Here's where the plot thickens: Patients can improve remarkably on these pumps. Flabby enlarged hearts shrink. Cardiac muscle cells long thought unsalvageable instead seem to repair. The occasional patient gets well enough to avoid a transplant, and very rarely one recovers enough to have the implanted pump removed, too. The question is how to control that repair so more people might benefit. Last fall, British doctors reported a small but stunning success: They implanted heart pumps in 15 about-to-die patients, and used high doses of standard drugs to help the pumps shrink their hearts. Then they administered clenbuterol to stimulate, and perhaps strengthen, the heart muscle. Eleven patients recovered enough to have their implants removed, and four years later, eight still are doing well. "To see something like this was so dramatic," says Dr. Keith Aaronson, medical director of the University of Michigan's heart transplant program. He oversees the U.S. study, which will attempt to duplicate those results in at least 30 Americans. Clenbuterol is used in other countries for veterinary medicine and occasionally to treat asthma &#151; but it has never been approved for sale in the U.S., and generates concern because of illegal use by athletes and others seeking its steroid-like effects. So why could it possibly help the heart, instead of do harm? It's not clear that it does, but Miller found a clue by studying pieces of heart muscle from advanced patients. The few who recovered harbored high levels of three powerful growth factors that may spur new cardiac cell growth, and a handful studied after experimental clenbuterol use seem to harbor even more. The experiment has risks. Both implanting and removing the heart pumps can cause life-threatening complications, including bleeding or infection; some people in the British study died. Nor are clenbuterol's side effects well-known; muscle tremors occurred in some British patients. "It is incumbent upon us to be very, very careful" in informing participants, Aaronson cautions, because "you're giving people hope of something that would be really, really wonderful." Other heart-failure specialists are pinning more hope on next-generation implantable heart pumps. A much smaller version of Thoratec Inc.'s HeartMate pump that's being used in the clenbuterol experiment is headed for the U.S. market, perhaps by summer. The battery-sized HeartMate II has fewer moving parts, pumps blood in a more continuous motion, and has other changes that proponents say should make it safer and last longer. Dr. Bud Frazier of the Texas Heart Institute says he has weaned a few people off the newer heart pump already without clenbuterol, and hopes to try weaning another 17 young patients. He calls avoiding a transplant crucial for the young especially, because eventually they fail, too. Regardless of how this research pans out, the heart association's Yancy wants more patients to seek care earlier because too many don't know that standard treatments have improved in recent years. "What we have in hand right now can really improve outcomes for the large majority of people with heart failure. We just have to get it to them," says Yancy, of Baylor University Medical Center in Dallas. EDITOR'S NOTE &#151; Lauran Neergaard covers health and medical issues for The Associated Press in Washington. Full Coverage: Heart and Circulatory Health Omega-3 fatty acids reduce blood pressure: study Reuters, 55 minutes ago Abused drug used to treat heart failure AP, 2 hours, 37 minutes ago Tap dancing 'saved my life' at BBC, Apr 24 To treat cardiac arrest, doctors cool the body at USATODAY.com, Dec 11 Biodegradable Stent Successful in Human Trial HealthDay via Yahoo! News, Jun 01 Unfair Treatment Can Harm the Heart HealthDay via Yahoo! News, May 16 at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), Feb 14 at Toledo Blade, Mar 12 Chemo and surgery may help colon cancer Study: Liver cancer breakthrough found EU launches campaign to tackle back pain China rejects U.S. warning on toothpaste TB quarantines common at local level Most Viewed - Health Study: Liver cancer breakthrough found Doctors say roller shoes injuring kids TB patient&#39;s family defend controversial travel Researchers find 2,100 year-old melon MRI better at spotting precancerous growths CNN - PM ET Germs in the workplace CNN - Sat Jun 2, 3:33 PM ET Friends stand by TB patient CNN - Sat Jun 2, 9:05 AM ET Fighting Cancer on a Video Game ABC News - Fri Jun 1, 10:04 PM ET Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get on the Web Initial tests negative for lawyer with TB Liver cancer patients get hope from kidney cancer drug Heelys Hazardous for Kids, Study Finds Find answers on Yahoo! Health: &raquo; More from Y! Health People of the Web A grandfather- grandson team soothes souls with online hugs. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/afp/20070604/wl_uk_afp/oly2012britainlogo London Olympic logo triggers debate - Yahoo! News London Olympic logo triggers debate AM ET LONDON (AFP) - The "iconic" logo for the 2012 London Olympics was unveiled here on Monday, but critics immediately condemned it as "hideous" and a waste of money. The jagged emblem, designed to define the image of the Games in five years&#39; time, comes in a series of bright shades of pink, blue, green and orange, and includes the signature five Olympic rings emblazoned onto the "0". "This is the vision at the very heart of our brand," said London 2012 organising committee chief Sebastian Coe, the former 800m and 1,500m world record holder who won gold in the 1,500 metres at the 1980 and 1984 Olympics. "It will define the venues we build and the Games we hold, and act as a reminder of our promise to use the Olympic spirit to inspire everyone and reach out to young people around the world," he said at the London launch. Organisers hope the logo, designed to be instantly recognisable worldwide, will help boost its campaign to raise two billion pounds to stage the Games. "This is an iconic brand that sums up what London 2012 is all about -- an inclusive, welcoming and diverse Games that involves the whole country," said Olympics minister Tessa Jowell. But critics were not impressed. Bob Neill, 2012 Olympics spokesman for the main opposition Conservative Party, was disparaging about Coe&#39;s optimism, despite him being a fellow Tory lawmaker. "Lord Coe has described this logo as &#39;ambitious, interactive and youth-friendly&#39;. I would describe it as hideous," he said. "Questions need be answered as to how we have ended up in this situation. Was there an open competition to supply the designs? If so, what on earth do the rejected ones look like! "We need to know how much money this exercise has cost, because whatever it was, it&#39;s been a complete waste of money." Initial public reaction was also less than positive. "This logo makes me embarrassed to be English," said a contributor called Clumbers on one online message site devoted to the logo, which was devoid of supporters of the chosen design. "It looks like it could have been done by a six year old. I could do better with my eyes closed," added someone called Bige. A poll by the BBC News website asked readers to give it a gold, silver or bronze medal, or a wooden spoon if they really didn&#39;t like it. Eighty three percent gave it a wooden spoon. The budget for the 2012 Olympics has soared to 9.3 billion pounds, nearly four times more than the first projections of how much it would cost to stage the Games in London. London unveils logo for 2012 Olympics AFP, AM ET Pyeongchang gets best review for Olympics AP, AM ET Karen Pickering, Former Olympic swimmer at The Independent (UK), Apr 25 Star power on sidelines at The Chicago Tribune (reg. req'd), Mar 06 London Olympics get new logo in motion at The Guardian (UK)., Jun 04 Olympics 2012 | London unveils logo of 2012 Games at BBC, Jun 04 America's Next Olympic Hopeful at MSNBC, Apr 12 at The Chicago Tribune (reg. req'd), Apr 11 Group claims captured troops were killed Guantanamo judge dismisses terror case Group denies link to NYC terror plot Tiananmen Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Most Viewed - World Group claims captured troops were killed Would-be suicide bomber dies in Somalia Guantanamo judge dismisses terror case Group denies link to NYC terror plot Pakistan&#39;s Musharraf tightens media regulations Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 40 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. The logo for the 2012 Olympic Games -- a jagged emblem in bold colours designed... Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center . All rights reserved. The information contained in the AFP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of Agence France Presse.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/vermont_secession Vt. secession movement gains traction - Yahoo! News Vt. secession movement gains traction By JOHN CURRAN, Associated Press Writer 2 hours, 34 minutes ago MONTPELIER, Vt. - At Riverwalk Records, the all-vinyl music store just down the street from the state Capitol, the black "US Out of Vt.!" T-shirts are among the hottest sellers. But to some people in Vermont, the idea is bigger than a $20 novelty. They want Vermont to secede from the United States &#151; peacefully, of course. Disillusioned by what they call an empire about to fall, a small cadre of writers and academics hopes to put the question before citizens in March. Eventually, they want to persuade state lawmakers to declare independence, returning Vermont to the status it held from 1777 to 1791. Neither the state nor the U.S. Constitution explicitly forbids secession, but few people think it is politically viable. "I always thought the Civil War settled that," said Russell Wheeler, a constitutional law expert at the Brookings Institution in Washington, D.C. If Vermont fought and won a war with the federal government, "then you could say Vermont proved the point. But that's not going to happen." Still, the idea has found plenty of sympathetic ears in Vermont, a left-leaning state that said yes to civil unions, no to slavery (before any other) and last year elected a socialist to the U.S. Senate. Supporters have published a "Green Mountain Manifesto" subtitled "Why and How Tiny Vermont Might Help Save America From Itself by Seceding from the Union." In 2005, about 300 people turned out for a secession convention in the Statehouse, and plans for a second one are in the works. A poll this year by the University of Vermont's Center for Rural Studies found that 13 percent of those surveyed support secession, up from 8 percent a year before. "The argument for secession is that the U.S. has become an empire that is essentially ungovernable &#151; it's too big, it's too corrupt and it no longer serves the needs of its citizens," said Rob Williams, editor of Vermont Commons, a quarterly newspaper dedicated to secession. "We have electoral fraud, rampant corporate corruption, a culture of militarism and war," Williams said. "If you care about democracy and self-governance and any kind of representative system, the only constitutional way to preserve what's left of the Republic is to peaceably take apart the empire." Vermont, which was historically conservative, has evolved into one of the nation's most liberal states since the latter part of the 20th century, a tie-dyed bastion of countercultural dissent and New England self-reliance where folks wear their hearts &#151; and their anti-war stickers &#151; on their Subaru station wagon bumpers. Secession movements have a long history. Key West, Fla., staged a mock secession from America in the 1980s. In Vermont, the town of Killington tried to break away and join New Hampshire in 2004, and Hawaii, Alaska, New Hampshire, South Carolina, and Texas all have some form of secession organizations today. The Vermont movement has been simmering for years but gained new traction because of the war, rising oil prices and the formation of several pro-secession groups. Secession supporters hope to have the question considered in March on Town Meeting Day, when voters gather to discuss state and local issues. Thomas Naylor, 70, a retired Duke University economics professor and author, wrote the manifesto and founded a secession group called Second Vermont Republic. His 112-page manifesto contains little explanation of how Vermont would make do without federal aid for security, education and social programs. Some in the movement foresee a Vermont with its own currency and passports, for example, and some form of representative government formed once the secession has taken place. Frank Bryan, a professor at the University of Vermont who has championed the cause for years, said the cachet of secession would make the new republic a magnet. "People would obviously relish coming to the Republic of Vermont, the Switzerland of North America," he said. "Christ, you couldn't keep them away." The Middlebury Institute, a Cold Spring, N.Y., think tank, hosted a North American Separatist Convention last fall in Burlington that drew representatives from 16 organizations. The group is co-sponsoring another conference in October in Chattanooga, Tenn. Of course, skeptics abound. "It doesn't make economic sense, it doesn't make political sense, it doesn't make historical sense. Other than that, it's a good idea," said Paul Gillies, a lawyer and Vermont historian. For now, the would-be secessionists are hoping to draw enough support to get the question on Town Meeting Day agendas. "We're normal human beings," said Williams, 39, a history professor at Champlain College. "But we're serious about this. We want people in Vermont to think about the options going forward. Do you want to stay in an empire that's in deep trouble?" Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Women prosecuted for smuggling children Dallas could elect its first gay mayor Court backs Mo. death penalty procedure Most Viewed - U.S. Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Paris Hilton begins jail term a day early Public denied access to Calif. beaches Women prosecuted for smuggling children Raw video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes ABC News minutes ago Metal Man Puts Mind Over Matter ABC News minutes ago Jury indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Get on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostemailed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_go_ot/congressman_probe Feds say La. congressman to be indicted - Yahoo! News Feds say La. congressman to be indicted By LARA JAKES JORDAN, Associated Press Writer PM ET WASHINGTON - An indictment charging Rep. William Jefferson ( ), D-La., in a long-running bribery investigation is being announced Monday, federal officials said. The indictment is being handed up in U.S. District Court in Alexandria. A press conference was being organized for late Monday in Washington to discuss the case. Full Coverage: U.S. Congress Members of Congress charged with crimes AP, 5 minutes ago Wyoming senator in serious condition AP, 7 minutes ago Congress' vote on Iraq war is only a prelude to a longer struggle at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Apr 30 Liberal lawmakers may sway key vote on Iraq war at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Mar 15 House GOP Uses Procedural Tactic To Frustrate Democratic Majority at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), May 19 GOP Crowd Forming for Shot at Freshman Walz in Minnesota 1 CQPolitics.com via Yahoo! News, May 09 at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), May 21 Beyond the Bush veto at Boston Globe, May 01 Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Analysis: The 2008 authenticity race Guantanamo judge dismisses terror case McCain, Romney clash over immigration Most Viewed - Politics Democratic congressman indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Robberies surge on violent crime survey McCain, Romney clash over immigration U.S. cuts back climate checks from space ABC News - 40 minutes ago Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq ABC News minutes ago Cold War Rhetoric: Building Missile Defenses ABC News minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. US Democratic Representative William Jefferson, pictured in 2006, who allegedly stashed 90,000 dollars in his... Rep. William Jefferson Indicted Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) U.S. Government - AP &raquo; More News Feeds Get on the Web Family ties at issue as Senate returns to immigration The Note: Meet The New John Edwards Poll: Opinions go against immigration measure SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. &raquo; More from Congressional Quarterly People of the Web A gay blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostemailed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_la_am_ca/guantanamo_trials Guantanamo judge dismisses terror case - Yahoo! News Guantanamo judge dismisses terror case By ANDREW O. SELSKY, Associated Press Writer GUANTANAMO BAY NAVAL BASE, Cuba - A military judge dismissed terrorism-related charges Monday against a prisoner charged with killing an American soldier in , delivering a blow to the Bush administration's attempt to try Guantanamo detainees in military courts. The ruling raised questions about whether the U.S. would have to further revise procedures for prosecuting prisoners, leading to major delays. The chief of military defense attorneys at Guantanamo Bay argued that the ruling could spell the end of the war-crimes trial system set up last year by Congress and after the Supreme Court threw out the previous system. But a law professor said it appeared the judge left open the possibility of filing new charges. A military prosecutor said the ruling would be appealed, and the U.S. military entity responsible for holding the military trials said it believed Congress intended to grant jurisdiction to try suspected Taliban and al-Qaida members and supporters. Canadian detainee Omar Khadr, who was 15 when he was captured after a deadly firefight in Afghanistan and who is now 20, will remain at the remote U.S. military base along with some 380 other men suspected of links to al-Qaida and the Taliban. The judge, Army Col. Peter Brownback, said he had no choice but to throw out the Khadr case because he had been classified as an "enemy combatant" by a military panel years earlier &#151; and not as an "alien unlawful enemy combatant." The Military Commissions Act, signed by Bush last year, says only those classified as "unlawful" enemy combatants can face war trials here, Brownback noted during the arraignment in a hilltop courtroom. Later Monday, a lawyer representing the only other detainee charged with war crimes, Salim Ahmed Hamdan, asked another military judge to throw out that case, based on the Khadr ruling. The judge, Navy Capt. Keith Allred, called a recess before the prosecutor could make a statement. Marine Col. Dwight Sullivan, head of the Guantanamo defense attorneys, said the dismissal in the Khadr case would have "huge" impact because none of the detainees held at this isolated military base in southeast Cuba has been found to be an "unlawful" enemy combatant. "It is not just a technicality; it's the latest demonstration that this newest system just does not work," Sullivan told journalists. "It is a system of justice that does not comport with American values." Sullivan said that in order to reclassify the detainees as "unlawful" combatants, the whole review system would have to be overhauled, a time-consuming act. said the issue was little more than semantics. A spokesman said the system was not dealing with lawful combatants, who fight in uniform for a national army. It was set up to determine if a detainee acted as an "unlawful enemy combatant" who was not in an internationally recognized military, did not wear a uniform or rank insignia, did not carry arms openly and was not a party to the Geneva Conventions, he said. "It is our belief that the concept was implicit that all the Guantanamo detainees who were designated as `enemy combatants' ... were in fact unlawful," Navy Cmdr. Jeffrey Gordon told Tobias, a law professor at the University of Richmond, said that because Brownback dismissed the case without prejudice, the U.S. may be able to retry Khadr. He also said it is unclear whether all detainees would have to be reclassified. A military spokeswoman, Army Maj. Beth Kubala, said the prosecution had five days in which to file an appeal. But Sullivan said the court designated to hear any appeal &#151; known as the court of military commissions review &#151; doesn't even exist. Kubala told AP Television News that Brownback's ruling underscored the fairness of the system. "The military commissions procedures and rules are robust and grant significant rights to the accused," she said. The only other Guantanamo detainee currently charged with crimes is Hamdan, who is accused of chauffeuring and being the al-Qaida chief's bodyguard. The third detainee charged under the new system, Australian David Hicks, pleaded guilty in March to providing material support to al-Qaida and is serving a nine-month sentence in Australia. Brownback's ruling came just minutes into Khadr's arraignment on charges he committed murder in violation of the law of war, attempted murder in violation of the law of war, conspiracy, providing material support for terrorism and spying. Khadr allegedly killed a U.S. Army soldier with a grenade in the firefight, in which he was wounded. He appeared in the courtroom with a beard and wearing an olive-green prison uniform. "The charges are dismissed without prejudice," Brownback pronounced as he adjourned the proceeding. A prosecutor, Army Capt. Keith Petty, said he had been prepared to show Khadr was an unlawful combatant because he fought for al-Qaida, and videotapes showed Khadr making and planting explosives targeting American soldiers. Khadr seemed oblivious to the ruling. He calmly watched the judge throw out the case &#151; looking not at Brownback but at a computer screen at the defense table that showed a live TV broadcast of the proceedings. Khadr could see himself on the screen The U.S. military has hoped to accelerate its prosecutions of Guantanamo detainees, with the Pentagon saying it expects to eventually charge about 80 of the 380 prisoners held at this isolated base, but questions lingered about the legitimacy of the process. The Supreme Court, ruling in favor of a lawsuit brought by Hamdan, last June threw out a previous military tribunal system that was set up in the wake of the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks, calling it unconstitutional. Congress responded with new guidelines for war-crimes trials and Bush signed them into law. Hamdan's attorney, Navy Lt. Cmdr. Charles Swift, told The Associated Press that he will challenge the new system as unconstitutional. For example, the Military Commissions Act retroactively made certain acts, such as conspiracy a crime, Swift said. "This case raises significant questions" about the separation of powers, Swift said. "Congress cannot violate the Constitution to fix things ... but they are backdating anything and making it a crime." Hamdan is charged with conspiracy &#151; centered on his alleged membership in al-Qaida and purported role in plotting to attack civilians and civilian targets &#151; and with providing material support for terrorism. As part of the second charge, Hamdan is accused of transporting at least one SA-7 surface-to-air missile to shoot down U.S. and coalition military aircraft in Afghanistan in November 2001. The son of an alleged al-Qaida financier, Khadr is accused of killing U.S. Army Sgt. Christopher Speer with a grenade during a firefight in Afghanistan on July 27, 2002. Khadr's attorneys said he was a child soldier and should be rehabilitated, not imprisoned. "The U.S. will be the first country in modern history to try an individual who was a child at the time of the alleged war crimes," the attorneys said in a joint statement in April. Full Coverage: Guantanamo Detainees Guantanamo judge dismisses terror case AP, 24 minutes ago Judge&#39;s ruling may halt all Guantanamo trials Reuters, 30 minutes ago at The Guardian (UK)., Jun 04 at The Economist, Mar 30 Guantanamo Canadian case dropped at BBC, Jun 04 Detainee Found Dead in Guantnamo Cell at The New York Times (reg. req'd), May 31 at Boston Globe, May 03 Gitmo: still a 'legal black hole' at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), May 01 Group claims captured troops were killed Group denies link to NYC terror plot Tiananmen Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Bramble and Sibierski join Wigan on free transfers Most Viewed - World Group claims captured troops were killed Would-be suicide bomber dies in Somalia Group denies link to NYC terror plot Pakistan&#39;s Musharraf tightens media regulations Russia warns U.S. about missile system Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 40 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. In this courtroom sketch reviewed and cleared for release by U.S. Military officials, Guantanamo detainee... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) World - AP Latin America Al-Qaida & Osama bin Laden &raquo; More News Feeds Get on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostemailed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_mi_ea/missing_soldiers_video Group claims captured troops were killed - Yahoo! News Group claims captured troops were killed By ANNA JOHNSON, Associated Press Writer CAIRO, Egypt - Al-Qaida linked insurgents killed three American soldiers after capturing them last month in , according to a militant video released Monday that claimed to show footage of the ambush. The video offered no proof for its claims. The clip, which was made available to The Associated Press by the Washington-based SITE Institute, showed confused and jerky night battle scenes, and later offered close-ups of two identification cards. It did not show the soldiers. "The Americans sent 4,000 soldiers looking for them," said an unidentified voice on the video, which featured the logo of the media production house of the Islamic State of Iraq. "They were alive and then dead." The body of one of the soldiers was found in Iraq's Euphrates River, but the other two remain missing. Family friends of the missing men said the U.S. military briefed relatives about the video over the weekend. The U.S. military insisted the search for the two missing soldiers would continue. "We condemn the tactics used by these terrorists, and are using all means available to pursue those responsible," said Brig. Gen. Kevin Bergner, the chief military spokesman in Baghdad. "We continue to search and hope that our two missing soldiers will be found alive and in good health. " The video offered no proof for its claims that the soldiers had been killed and buried. The voiceover blamed their deaths on "the American Army and their leaders, who do not care for the feelings of the soldiers' mothers." "And as you refused to deliver the bodies of our killed people, we will not deliver the bodies of your dead, and their end will be beneath the ground, Allah willing," the voice said. A body found May 23 in the Euphrates River was identified by the U.S. military as Pfc. Joseph Anzack Jr., 20, of Torrance, Calif. The missing soldiers have been identified as Spc. Alex R. Jimenez, 25, of Lawrence, Mass., and of Pvt. Byron W. Fouty, 19, of Waterford, Mich. The three vanished after their combat team was ambushed May 12 about 20 miles outside Baghdad. Five others, including an Iraqi, were killed in the ambush, subsequently claimed by al-Qaida. The attack triggered a massive search in the area south of Baghdad known as the "triangle of death" for the rampant insurgent activity there. Gordon Dibler, Fouty's stepfather, said he was holding out hope for the soldiers' safe return: "We're praying, and so far, we don't know for certain that they aren't alive." At the end of the 10-minute 41-second video, the identification cards of the two missing soldiers were shown, with the headline: "Bush is the reason of the loss of your POWs" written on the screen above the cards. SITE, an organization that monitors terrorist groups, did not say how it obtained the video. A card belonging to Anzack was not shown. Along with the identification cards, the footage also showed credit cards, American and Iraqi money and other personal items the militants called "booty." Bergner, the U.S. spokesman, said the footage "doesn't appear to contain any definitive evidence indicating the status of our missing soldiers." The video also showed footage, apparently taken before the ambush, of three masked men standing around a stand displaying a sketch of the area, mapping out the attack plan. One of the three men, who were all dressed in black, talked to the camera and pointed to the sketch. Another stood by him carrying a gun. "I have urged you to bring me American prisoners," said the man, whose name was not given but was identified as one of the militant group's leaders. A Islamic Web site that commonly posts videos from militant groups including the Islamic State of Iraq said in a banner headline that it would show the video within hours, but the video has not yet appeared. After the soldiers disappeared, the Islamic State of Iraq issued Web statements warning the Americans to call off the hunt "if you want their safety." Associated Press writer David N. Goodman contributed to this report from Detroit. Full Coverage: U.S. Armed Forces China&#39;s military must be more transparent: Pace AFP, AM ET US military analysis says troop &#39;surge&#39; in Iraq short of goal AFP, AM ET Lessons from the Great War at The Chicago Tribune (reg. req'd), May 28 Another Memorial Day Marks Grief's Journey at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), May 28 2 Marines Deny Suspecting Haditha War Crime at The New York Times (reg. req'd), May 31 Record Turnout Marks Rolling Thunder Ride's 20th Anniversary at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), May 28 Memorial Day is a chance to reflect Blame politicians, not those fighting at L.A. Daily News, May 28 Guantanamo judge dismisses terror case Group denies link to NYC terror plot Tiananmen Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Bramble and Sibierski join Wigan on free transfers Most Viewed - World Guantanamo judge dismisses terror case Would-be suicide bomber dies in Somalia Group denies link to NYC terror plot Russia warns U.S. about missile system Pakistan&#39;s Musharraf tightens media regulations Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 41 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. This is an image made from video obtained by the Washington-based SITE Institute showing the... Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead A new militant video claims that three U.S. soldiers captured after an ambush are dead; one soldier&#39;s body has been found, but the U.S. military says it will continue to search for the two others. (June 4) &raquo; More AP video Soldiers&#39; ID cards online The military ID cards of two soldiers missing in Iraq have appeared on an Islamic web site. CNN&#39;s Barbara Starr reports. &raquo; More CNN video &raquo; Show all news video Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Middle East News - AP &raquo; More News Feeds Get on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostemailed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_la_am_ca/terrorism_plot_trinidad Group denies link to NYC terror plot - Yahoo! News Group denies link to NYC terror plot By TONY FRASER, Associated Press Writer PORT-OF-SPAIN, Trinidad - The leader of a radical Trinidadian Muslim group denied Monday that his organization had any connection to four men accused of planning to attack New York's John F. Kennedy International Airport. Yasin Abu Bakr, the leader of Jamaat al Muslimeen, told The Associated Press he knew "nothing" about the alleged plan to bomb a fuel pipeline feeding the airport, a plot authorities say was hatched by a group that included a former Guyanese politician. U.S. authorities claim the alleged plotters sought support in Trinidad from Jamaat al Muslimeen, which staged a deadly coup attempt in the Caribbean nation in 1990. The men did not receive such support, according to court documents. But the documents also say that Abdel Nur, a Guyanese suspect thought to be still at large in Trinidad, said he met in May with Abu Bakr at his compound in Trinidad and the Islamic leader suggested that he return later with others involved "to discuss the plan in detail." Nur allegedly said the Jamaat al Muslimeen leader also wanted to do further checks on Russell Defreitas, the 63-year-old accused mastermind of the plot, and an unidentified confidential informant who had infiltrated the group, the documents said. Abu Bakr declined to say if he knew the men, but also denied any involvement. "I know nothing about these men, and I have nothing to do with whatever they are being charged for," he said in his first public comments since U.S. authorities disclosed the plot on Saturday. Two of the suspects &#151; Abdul Kadir, a former member of Guyana's parliament, and Kareem Ibrahim of Trinidad &#151; are in custody in Trinidad. Nur was being sought by Trinidadian authorities. Defreitas, a U.S. citizen native to Guyana and former JFK air cargo employee, was jailed in the United States. Abu Bakr's group, often accused of aiming to create an Islamic state in Trinidad, describes itself simply as a religious organization. The group stormed Parliament and took the prime minister and his Cabinet hostage in a 1990 rebellion that left 24 dead &#151; the only Islamic revolt in the Western Hemisphere. The rebels eventually surrendered and were later pardoned. It is not known to have international reach, although a member was convicted of trying to smuggle 70 assault rifles to Trinidad from Florida in 2005. Abu Bakr faces charges stemming from a 2005 sermon in which he called for war against rich Muslims who refuse to pay zakaat, an Islamic tithe used to alleviate poverty. The following week, he was arrested by police who razed the group's compound and charged him with sedition and incitement to violence. "You know why they are linking me with this so-called plot is to bias the minds of jurors who will be sitting in my case," he said. Separately, a lawyer for the two men held in Trinidad said they would fight extradition to the United States. Ibrahim and Kadir made their initial court appearance Monday for extradition on one count each of conspiracy to commit a terrorist act against the U.S. government. "We will be opposing extradition," said Rajid Persad, a lawyer who represents both men. The judge set another hearing for June 11 to consider bail and scheduled an extradition hearing for Aug. 2. Farid Scoon, another lawyer for the men, said they intend to seek bail. The extradition fight could be a drawn-out affair. Ibrahim and Kadir could appeal all the way to the Privy Council in Britain, the highest court of appeal for the former British territory. Full Coverage: Terrorism & 9/11 Guantanamo judge dismisses terror case AP, 30 minutes ago Group denies link to NYC terror plot AP, 33 minutes ago One Had Stature and One Didn't, but Neither Seemed an Extremist at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 This terror plot was homegrown at Newsday, Jun 03 Hunt for fourth man in NY airport terror plot at The Guardian (UK)., Jun 04 The Christian Science Monitor via Yahoo! News, Jun 04 Terrorists, Chemicals and Trains at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 Break up the FBI at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Mar 21 Group claims captured troops were killed Guantanamo judge dismisses terror case Tiananmen Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Bramble and Sibierski join Wigan on free transfers Most Viewed - World Group claims captured troops were killed Would-be suicide bomber dies in Somalia Guantanamo judge dismisses terror case Pakistan&#39;s Musharraf tightens media regulations Russia warns U.S. about missile system Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 41 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Trinidadian Kareem Ibrahim, 56, arrives to the Magistrate Court for an extradition hearing in downtown... Drug convict helped bust JFK plot A convicted drug dealer secretly fed information to federal investigators, playing a key role in exposing a terrorism plot against JFK airport. (June 4) &raquo; More AP video &raquo; Show all news video Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) World - AP Latin America &raquo; More News Feeds Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070604/us_nm/children_athletics_dc Soccer moms beware: more may not be better - Yahoo! News Soccer moms beware: more may not be better AM ET CHICAGO (Reuters) - Doctors should urge children involved in competitive sports to take plenty of time off to avoid physical injuries and mental strain, the American Academy of Pediatrics said on Monday. Overtraining, burnout and injuries caused by overuse of muscles "are a growing problem in the United States," the group said in a report published in its monthly journal "Pediatrics." Even though childhood obesity is grabbing headlines, the report said, organized and recreational athletics has boomed and now involves between 30 million and 45 million children ages 6 to 18 in the United States. The report said pediatricians should "encourage athletes to strive to have at least one to two days off per week from competitive athletics, sport-specific training and competitive practice (scrimmage) to allow them to recover both physically and psychologically." As children seek to build up their skill, weekly training time, the number of exercise repetitions or total distance should not rise by more than 10 percent each week, it said. Juvenile athletes should be encouraged "to take at least two to three months away from a specific sport during the year," the report added. In addition, the report said doctors and parents should "encourage the athlete to participate on only one team during a season. If the athlete is also a member of a traveling or select team, then that participation time should be incorporated into the aforementioned guidelines." Doctors should provide "a special caution to parents with younger athletes who participate in multi-game tournaments in short periods of time," the report said. The pediatricians who wrote the report said aiming for the Olympics or a career in professional sports was unrealistic for most children. Less than 1 percent of high school athletes make it to the pros, the report said. The academy -- http://www.aap.org/ -- represents 60,000 U.S. and Canadian pediatricians. Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Women prosecuted for smuggling children Dallas could elect its first gay mayor Court backs Mo. death penalty procedure Most Viewed - U.S. Vt. secession movement gains traction Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot Paris Hilton begins jail term a day early Public denied access to Calif. beaches Raw video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 55 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes ABC News minutes ago Metal Man Puts Mind Over Matter ABC News minutes ago Jury indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Kids play soccer in an undated image. Doctors should urge children involved in competitive sports... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 Reuters Limited. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/mostemailed/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070604/sc_nm/suriname_species_dc Purple frog among 24 new species found in Suriname - Yahoo! News Purple frog among 24 new species found in Suriname By Deborah Zabarenko, Environment Correspondent 1 hour, 36 minutes ago WASHINGTON (Reuters) - A purple fluorescent frog is one of 24 new species found in the South American highlands of Suriname, conservationists reported on Monday, warning that these creatures are threatened by illegal gold mining. The discovery of so many species outside the insect realm is extraordinary and points up the need to survey distant regions, said Leeanne Alonso of Conservation International, which led the expedition that found the new species. "When you go to these places that are so unexplored and so remote, we do tend to find new species ... but most of them are insects," Alonso said by telephone from Suriname&#39;s capital, Paramaribo. "What&#39;s really exciting here is we found a lot of new species of frogs and fish as well." The two-tone frog -- whose skin is covered with irregular fluorescent lavender loops on a background of aubergine -- was discovered in 2006 as part of a survey of Suriname&#39;s Nassau plateau, the conservation group said. Scientists combing Suriname&#39;s Nassau plateau and Lely Mountains found four other new frog species aside from the purple one, six species of fish, 12 dung beetles and a new ant species, the organization said in a statement. These creatures were discovered by 13 scientists who explored a region about 80 miles southeast of Paramaribo, including areas with enough clean fresh water sources to support abundant fish and amphibians. They also found 27 species native to the Guayana Shield region, which spreads over Suriname, Guyana, French Guiana and northern Brazil. One of these was the rare armored catfish, which conservationists feared was extinct because gold miners had contaminated a creek where it was last seen 50 years ago. Including the new species, the scientists observed 467 species at the two sites, ranging from large cats like panthers and pumas, to monkeys, reptiles, bats and insects. While these places are far from human civilization, they are totally unprotected and may be threatened by illegal gold-mining, Alonso said. These highland areas have also been investigated as sources of bauxite, used to make aluminum, but will most likely not be mined in the future, she said, at least not by the two mining companies that sponsored the study. The sponsors are BHP Billiton Maatschappij Suriname (BMS, a subsidiary of BHP Billiton) Suriname Aluminium Company LLC (Suralco, a subsidiary of Alcoa Inc). "It&#39;s an opportunity now for all the players, the mining companies who still have mining concessions there, the local communities, the government, the NGOs (non-governmental organizations), to try to make a regional plan for the area," Alonso said. Full Coverage: Animals and Insects Purple frog among 24 new species found in Suriname Reuters via Yahoo! News, Jun 04 Sharks Use Strange Trick to Hunt Prey LiveScience.com via Yahoo! News, Jun 04 Yahoo! News :: Chronologically Sorted Category Scientists scramble to save U.S. shorebird Reuters via Yahoo! News, Jun 03 Beyond the harpoon - whale saving begins at home at BBC, May 11 Crisis Over Pet Food Extracting Healthy Cost at The Washington Post (reg. req'd), May 04 Take a Rat to Dinner at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Mar 16 The New, Old Leopard at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Mar 16 Scientists find 24 species in Suriname Indonesian kangaroos to gain freedom Probe passing Venus on way to Mercury China won't adopt caps on gas emissions Israel Museum displays rare manuscript Most Viewed - Science New Depression Rx: Get Married Man says he captured Loch Ness on film Scientists find 24 species in Suriname Sharks Use Strange Trick to Hunt Prey Blame coal: Texas leads carbon emissions Weather & Science Video weather.com - 15 minutes ago weather.com - 15 minutes ago weather.com - 15 minutes ago weather.com - 15 minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. A purple fluorescent frog, of the genus Atelopus and discovered during a follow-up survey of... New species found in Suriname Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Animals & Pets News &raquo; More News Feeds Elsewhere on the Web Divers dismantle artificial tire reef New insights into earliest trees uncovered Study: Climate change models overstate droughts SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Are cicadas crawling out of the ground at your house? Submit your photos to You Witness News. Track innovations in science, health and technology. Explore the world's wonders and the battle to save them. The most popular science news stories and photos. &raquo; All Most Popular Copyright &copy; 2007 Reuters Limited. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon.
http://news.yahoo.com/i/964 Most popular news stories as ranked by readers of Yahoo! News Study: Liver cancer breakthrough found CHICAGO - For the first time, doctors said Monday they have found a pill that improves survival for people with liver cancer, a notoriously hard to treat disease diagnosed in more than half a million people globally each year. Vt. secession movement gains traction 2 hours, 35 minutes ago MONTPELIER, Vt. - At Riverwalk Records, the all-vinyl music store just down the street from the state Capitol, the black "US Out of Vt.!" T-shirts are among the hottest sellers. New Depression Rx: Get Married AM ET People who are looking to ease depression may have a new treatment option--marriage. 'Piggybacking' roils credit industry Sun Jun 3, 6:57 PM ET Only a low credit score stood between Alipio Estruch and a mortgage to buy a $449,000 Spanish-style house in Weston, Fla., a few miles west of Fort Lauderdale. Study: Liver cancer breakthrough found CHICAGO - For the first time, doctors said Monday they have found a pill that improves survival for people with liver cancer, a notoriously hard to treat disease diagnosed in more than half a million people globally each year. SAT prep courses? Save your money Fri Jun 1, 6:49 AM ET School&#39;s out. For kids, this typically means three months of freedom. But for many high school students, they will be enrolled in SAT test preparation classes with painful names such as "SAT Boot Camp" and "Intensive SAT," meeting five days a week. Feds say La. congressman to be indicted PM ET WASHINGTON - An indictment charging Rep. William Jefferson, D-La., in a long-running bribery investigation is being announced Monday, federal officials said. Three mild earthquakes shake NH coast AM ET EXETER, N.H. - After people called 911 to report hearing explosions, emergency officials initially thought there had been underground methane gas blasts. But it turns out that New Hampshire actually had three small earthquakes over the weekend. Purple frog among 24 new species found in Suriname 1 hour, 36 minutes ago WASHINGTON (Reuters) - A purple fluorescent frog is one of 24 new species found in the South American highlands of Suriname, conservationists reported on Monday, warning that these creatures are threatened by illegal gold mining. Doctors say roller shoes injuring kids AM ET CHICAGO - Trendy wheeled sneakers that let kids zip down sidewalks, across playgrounds and through mall crowds could also send them rolling into emergency rooms on a stretcher, say doctors who blame a rash of injuries on the international craze. Abused drug used to treat heart failure 2 hours, 38 minutes ago WASHINGTON - U.S. doctors are beginning a dramatic experiment this month to try to save patients dying from congestive heart failure &#151; by temporarily resting their hearts and then boosting them with a drug long abused for bodybuilding. Group claims captured troops were killed CAIRO, Egypt - Al-Qaida linked insurgents killed three American soldiers after capturing them last month in Iraq, according to a militant video released Monday that claimed to show footage of the ambush. The video offered no proof for its claims. Purple frog among 24 new species found in Suriname 1 hour, 36 minutes ago WASHINGTON (Reuters) - A purple fluorescent frog is one of 24 new species found in the South American highlands of Suriname, conservationists reported on Monday, warning that these creatures are threatened by illegal gold mining. Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note 1 hour, 24 minutes ago PRAGUE, Czech Republic - President Bush's European trip was jarred as it began Monday by deteriorating relations with Russia and threatening words from President Vladimir Putin. Ex-Enron executive sentenced to 2 years in prison HOUSTON (Reuters) - The former chief operating officer of Enron Corp.&#39;s broadband Internet division, Kevin Hannon, was sentenced to 2 years in federal prison for his role in the fraud that led to the giant energy company&#39;s collapse, a court official said on Monday. Hilton completes first night in LA jail 1 hour, 15 minutes ago LYNWOOD, Calif. - Paris Hilton completed the first night of her probation sentence as morning arrived Monday in her new surroundings &#151; a Los Angeles County jail cell that will be her home for much of this month. Feds say La. congressman to be indicted PM ET WASHINGTON - An indictment charging Rep. William Jefferson, D-La., in a long-running bribery investigation is being announced Monday, federal officials said. Vt. secession movement gains traction 2 hours, 35 minutes ago MONTPELIER, Vt. - At Riverwalk Records, the all-vinyl music store just down the street from the state Capitol, the black "US Out of Vt.!" T-shirts are among the hottest sellers. Seacrest a laughmaker in `Knocked Up' NEW YORK - Ryan Seacrest is known as a lot of things &#151; slick "American Idol" ringmaster, hotshot radio deejay, ubiquitous E! channel host &#151; but funny guy's not one of them. Which makes his scene-stealing cameo in "Knocked Up" such an amusing surprise. Iraq Qaeda group says killed captured U.S. troops DUBAI (Reuters) - An al Qaeda-led group in Iraq signaled in a Web video on Monday that it had killed three U.S. soldiers after capturing them last month, showing only pictures of ID cards of two missing U.S. soldiers. McCain, Romney clash over immigration CORAL GABLES, Fla. - Republican presidential hopefuls John McCain and Mitt Romney clashed on Monday over the immigration bill, with McCain embracing the measure as a practical solution and Romney dismissing it as unworkable. AM ET The Nation -- A recent study commissioned by Congress concluded that abstinence-only programs are completely ineffective in preventing or delaying teenagers from having sexual intercourse. Nor do they lower unwanted pregnancy rates or lessen the spread of sexually transmitted diseases. U.S., Iraqi troops control only a third of Baghdad PM ET BAGHDAD (Reuters) - U.S.-led soldiers control only about a third of Baghdad, the military said on Monday, almost four months into a security crackdown during which troops are dying at rates not seen for more than two years. Judge&#39;s ruling may halt all Guantanamo trials GUANTANAMO BAY U.S. NAVAL BASE, Cuba (Reuters) - The U.S. war crimes tribunals at Guantanamo came to a screeching halt on Monday when a military judge dropped all the charges against a young Canadian in a ruling that could preclude trying any of the 380 prisoners. Companies seen warming to idea of health reform PM ET CHICAGO (Reuters) - As rising health costs erode profits, U.S. corporations are expected to warm up to health care reform under the next president -- a prospect that would have been unthinkable just a few years ago. Polish girl's Holocaust diary unveiled 1 hour, 1 minute ago JERUSALEM - The diary of a 14-year-old Jewish girl, dubbed the "Polish Anne Frank," was unveiled Monday by Israel's Holocaust museum more than 60 years after the teenager vividly described the world crumbling around her as she came of age in a Jewish ghetto. Bush urged to back U.N. climate deal at summit PM ET BERLIN (Reuters) - The EU, United Nations and G8 president Germany urged U.S. President George W. Bush on Monday to help strike a U.N. deal to combat climate change at a summit of major powers this week and not to pursue rival proposals. China newspaper ad salutes Tiananmen mothers PM ET BEIJING (Reuters) - An advertisement saluting mothers of students and workers killed in the 1989 Tiananmen Square crackdown appeared in a newspaper in southwest China on Monday, two witnesses said, in a rare public criticism of the massacre. MRI better at spotting precancerous growths AM ET CHICAGO (Reuters) - MRI scans are far better than mammograms at spotting a type of precancerous growth before it becomes invasive breast cancer, a German researcher said on Sunday. Hundreds of millions to suffer from melting ice, UN warns 2 hours, 7 minutes ago TROMSOE, Norway (AFP) - The melting of the Earth&#39;s ice has accelerated in recent decades, an alarming phenomenon that could affect hundreds of millions of people across the world, the United Nations warned in a report on Monday. Nicaragua president to visit Iran in Gaddafi&#39;s jet Sun Jun 3, 8:28 PM ET MANAGUA, Nicaragua (Reuters) - Nicaraguan President Daniel Ortega, who has raised eyebrows in Washington by forging ties with Iran, said on Sunday he will travel to the country aboard a jet on loan from Libyan leader Muammar Gaddafi. View Most Popular stories and photos by date. The New York Times goes to bat in the first inning of their baseball game against the at Fenway Park in Boston Friday, June 1, 2007. (AP Photo/Winslow Townson)" height="130" width="113" border="0" title="Fans at Fenway Park in Boston wear blonde masks as New York ..."/> -- a jagged emblem in bold colours designed to define the image of the Games in five years&#39; time -- has been unveiled in London. Critics immediately condemned it as "hideous" and a waste of money.(AFP/Shaun Curry)" height="82" width="130" border="0" title="The logo for the 2012 Olympic Games -- a jagged emblem in bold ..."/> . (AP Photo/SITE Institute) " height="97" width="130" border="0" title="This is an image made from video obtained by the Washington-based ..."/> after the 26-year-old heiress turned herself in to begin her three week stint at the Century Regional Detention Facility. Hours after strolling the red carpet in a strapless black dress, Hilton traded her designer duds for a jail-issued jumpsuit. (AP Photo/Los Angeles County Sherrif)" height="130" width="103" border="0" title="This photo made available Monday, June 4, 2007 by the Los Angeles ..."/> sits in the audience during the MTV Movie Awards in Los Angeles, Sunday, June 3, 2007. (AP Photo/Kevork Djansezian)" height="130" width="102" border="0" title="Paris Hilton sits in the audience during the MTV Movie Awards ..."/> dressed in a black and white striped jailbird suit is on display on the red carpet at Madame Tussauds New York Monday, June 4, 2007 in New York. The wax figure of Hilton dressed in the jailbird outfit will be on display at the museum in Times Square for the duration of her jail sentence. The 26-year-old heiress checked into the Century Regional Detention Facility in Lynwood, Calif. just after 11:30 p.m. Sunday for violating her probation in an alcohol-related reckless driving case. (AP Photo/Mary Altaffer)" height="130" width="86" border="0" title="A wax figure of Paris Hilton dressed in a black and white striped ..."/> (R) is shown in the back seat of a car with her mother Kathy Hilton in this frame grab from TMZ.com video, as she leaves her parents' home, as she prepares to surrender to Los Angeles County Sheriff's department officials late evening June 3, 2007 in Los Angeles. Earlier in the evening Paris Hilton attended the MTV Movie Awards, posed for photographers and spoke with reporters. Hilton was to begin her jail sentence on or before June 5. (TMZ.COM/Handout/Reuters)" height="97" width="130" border="0" title="Paris Hilton (R) is shown in the back seat of a car with her ..."/> dressed in a black and white striped jailbird suit on display at Madame Tussauds New York Monday, June 4, 2007 in New York. Rogers, a 10th grade teacher, told the wax figure of Hilton 'Sorry, but you got to do your penance, be a role model.' The wax figure of Hilton dressed in the jailbird outfit will be on display at the museum in Times Square for the duration of her jail sentence. The 26-year-old heiress checked into the Century Regional Detention Facility in Lynwood, Calif. just after 11:30 p.m. Sunday for violating her probation in an alcohol-related reckless driving case. (AP Photo/Mary Altaffer)" height="130" width="86" border="0" title="Linda Rogers, from Oxford, Ala., talks to a wax figure of Paris ..."/> arrives at the 2007 MTV Movie Awards in Los Angeles, June 3, 2007. (Fred Prouser/Reuters)" height="92" width="130" border="0" title="Paris Hilton arrives at the 2007 MTV Movie Awards in Los Angeles, ..."/> war says the United States can forget about winning the war.(AFP/File/Roslan Rahman)" height="86" width="130" border="0" title="US Marines prepare for a night patrol in the restive city of ..."/> 30 May at Camp Pendleton, California. An internal US military assessment indicates that three months after the beginning of a troop "surge" in Baghdad, the military has been able to establish tentative control over fewer than one-third of the citys neighborhoods, The New York Times reported on its website Sunday(AFP/Getty Images/File/David McNew)" height="130" width="86" border="0" title="US Marine hugs his daughter after returning from Iraq 30 May ..."/> poses on the red carpet before the MTV Movie Awards in Los Angeles, Sunday, June 3, 2007. (AP Photo/Matt Sayles)" height="130" width="69" border="0" title="Jessica Alba poses on the red carpet before the MTV Movie Awards ..."/> arrives at the MTV Movie Awards in Los Angeles on Sunday, June 3, 2007. (AP Photo/Matt Sayles)" height="130" width="75" border="0" title="Megan Fox arrives at the MTV Movie Awards in Los Angeles on ..."/> New species found in Suriname New species found in Suriname &raquo; Go to this contest on Bix Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (Learn about My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds
